I know the day will probably come, but I`m hoping that it`s in the far distant future.
Coarse sea salt
The only problem I have is with chicken. I seriously think that I could probably eat chicken every day of the week, and I probably have sometimes. I’m glad the master cleanse has given me so much discipline over the way I eat. I really think about it now. Which brings me to trying the veggie burger. My friends keep telling me, there’s no reason to fear chicken. Just don’t fry it all the time, and don’t go nuts at Popeyes. They are probably right, but I’ll decide on meat after I go to a wedding and wear an awesome dress next week. I may even push it to Thanksgiving so I can show my mother my progress and she can stop asking me if “I’m in the family way.”
(Ends).
Mom: Damn it....go get the phone.
The instructions are to perform each exercise until you can't do it anymore. Write down your totals. I, personally, would perform these the similar to the way I did in class, 10 reps each for 10 minutes.
I loved those!
Gregory: Conservatives are very upset that you
The show has been shot at the very location that Julian Assange has been under house arrest for the last year and a half.
chopped fresh onions if you have them
“Among those arrested were a photojournalists from Malaysiakini,Guang Ming newspaper and a Malay Mail journalist.
Through food stamps and funerals, Super Bowls and serving others, Brenda’s strength is unwavering. Her determination to dream new dreams, willingness to learn from her mistakes, and commitment to giving back to her community make her a role model for women of all backgrounds.
Rooted in the highly communal tradition of American quilt making, “Grasping Flight” references the communal nature of our globalized world and asks the viewer to explore that reality.
I adhered different strips of Studio Calico papers to my white cardbase, and layered everything on top. I die-cut a label shape into my kraft mat, and ran it through with the woodgrain impression plate. It's faint in the pictures, but it's there. I then created a sentiment flag, and stamped and cut out 3 peonies (from the "pretty peonies" set.)
“Hey, just so you know, when your brother was taking a shower downstairs, water started coming up through the drain like what happened last year. So, we had to make an emergency phone call to Roto Rooter and they’ll be here sometime between 8 and noon tomorrow. If you have to use the bathroom, you’ll have to go outside.”
Rexy decided at the eleventh hour (well, about 10 hours before - instead of signing up on the first day) that she wanted to be in the talent show at camp. When Phil asked her what she wanted to do, she said "Dance!" She subsequently told him that her dance was called "The Turtle Nutcracker." We met with the teacher in charge of the talent show and he played about six songs for her from his itunes collection - she knew immediately that this is the one she wanted.
53. Fahrenheit 451: Ray Bradbury
Good morning and happy Monday to all!! After a short vacation, the carts at SCACD are back open for business, and Susana has of course been busy adding more fantastic new goodies to the shelves. :) Here's just a little taste of what's new:
terriavidreader (IN-USA) said...
This tag was done with my copic makers--I sprayed the tag with bg05 and layered some sequin waste on top of it. Then, I used R27, Bg05, and e44 along with my airbrush to spray some tyvek. I then melted the tyvek to create the texture. (To get a better idea, you really should click on it, it's hard to see well in this size.) I then cut out the heart and colored it using bg0000, bg01 and bg05. I spayed the bird (a stencil from Coffee Break designs) using bv25. I went back with my blender and dotted the bird to create the polka-dots. I outlined the dots using my spica pens and did the outline/tree using my multi-liner. The white at the top is the copic opaque white.
“Pilot!” Wei bellowed.
(3) Planetary ruler
mr. jim has lived many years since that marvelous day and his life surely proves that he is a true child of the lord jesus and if we never meet on this earth mr. jim, bernie and i will surely meet you on the other side...
29. Hang Ups (NEW Reflection Eternal not on album)
Many other breeds of cat could also benefit from the same treatment, Siamese tend to have that awful irritating high pitched Meow, Burmese can be grumpy, and as for Sphinx cats and the Cornish Rex, well they are just plain ugly. (Tabbies, of course, are so much prettier and healthier, albeit a little boring after a while.)
My husband is working until after ten tonight so no great romantic meal is being prepared in our kitchen tonight.
If you get too sure of what you know, without examining it, you end up sounding like this:
I'm just interested:
So yeah, I let Andy have half of the pie and took the other half to work. Needless to say, it was a winner all around. If you're a chocolate lover - you have got to try this!
Responding to a Freedom of Information request filed by The Post seven months ago, the mayor's office last week provided just nine e-mail exchanges between Haggerty and mayoral aides in all of 2008 and 2009. There were other e-mails that the mayor's refuses to release on the grounds of "personal privacy." They're so private, in fact, officials won't even say how many e-mails are being withheld.
For the outfit on the right I paired your top with a powder blue pleated skirt that has beaded designs and horizontal pleats near the bottom. Added is a black fitted jacket with black and blue pinstripes, black heels with little bows and blue stitching, and some silvery white flower chained hoop earrings and matching bracelet.
--translated by Albert Ernest Flemming
I consider to be a whole new breed of Americana. No easy feat.
WG: How many domestic helpers do you have?
outward expression of showing that he loves you, but not necessarily meeting your
After providing police with the details about the conviction, he was told he didn’t need to register, the suit said.
When someone dies young, people often view it as a tragedy – a life cut short, with wasted potential. Premature physical death can indeed be tragic. But there’s another kind of death that’s a blessing, especially when people are young: death to self.
Bono is making a random guest appearance via satellite - his introducing a band. Oh Dierks Bentley. Samantha made fun of me last year because I thought they were a person and not a band!
Not having been here for three years made the reunion with our favorite place even more special. Our bellies full, we spent the afternoons easing back into the familiar surroundings, reminiscing about summers past, and catching up with old friends.
This place was very Thai orientated.... fair enough I'm in Thailand!! But in terms of a beer enthusiast looking for the western microbrewery experience you won't find it here aye.. The main attraction is the big stage show with various choreographed dancing and singing shows in Thai and also some English pop/R&B solo and duet songs are performed.... highly entertaining to be honest! The beer here is surprisingly fantastic though which is the main thing!
Inks: Stampin' Up! Pens - Basic Black, Basic Grey, Old Olive, Rose Red
Shelbourne 15/8 (Bet365); Draw 21/10 (General); Derry City6/4 (General)
"Just the lager....ya know it, ya know it...heeeeHHHEEEEEE!"
Drinking: The sour taste of defeat.
And my Willow House business continues to do well. I'd love to show off some of the new products as well as the new designer jewelry by Sara Blaine that we now sell as our second division here at Willow House. I'd also like to feature some decorating ideas if that's okay with you........I know so many of you only have a certain amount of time on the web, so I'd love to feature things that you want to read about....any suggestions are welcome; please leave a comment. I think many bloggers now are crunched for time and not spending the extra time to comment. I have been there. But I would also ask that you at least say HI, and let me know that I have one or two readers!! Thanks!
But this new nesting coffee table combo from Ikea is well within my price range. I love the varying height between the tables and it would still give the illusion of more space in my living area.
What does he do? He makes something out of wood (generally) to precise measurements. Then that wooden bit is placed in a sand mold and removed. Molten metal is poured in the void. Bingo, a casting. Often a BIG casting.
HOPE YOUR WEEKEND IS A GREAT ONE!!
It was a battle of babyhood to grave.
Cardstock: Pearls - Cardmaker Series, Imaginisce - Enchanted Collection DP
the machines have risen up.
“With no clear objective, an unrealistic concept, an over reliance upon airpower and an underestimation of the enemy, it was only a matter of time before the French battalions fighting Viet divisions were utterly destroyed. The fundamental law of military strategy – to be stronger than your enemy at the decisive time and place – was violated. The aftermath of the battle was truly horrific, with an estimated 70% of the 10,000 captured French forces dying on the march into Viet Minh POW camps or of subsequent mistreatment in only three months time.
Cinnamon and sugar mixture
The crit and dodge chances especially help with the Zealous Set, as you will have 4 crit and 3 dodge on your character. It doesn't seem like much, but being naturally fast makes criticals appear more often. You can substitute these points into speed or health instead, however, giving you more a beefy feel. You also can take points out of Holy Power to put elsewhere; more dodge? speed? Even into Sagacious branch would not be too bad either for a little more heal power or defense against magic.
However, we just entered the doorway to a new cycle. Two new sunspots appeared on the sun’s disk last week, one (1045) described by SOHO as ‘awesome’ and ‘complex’ and the other (1046) – which just appeared around the edge – seems set to outdo its neighbor. Because of the Sun’s altered magnetic orientation in the new cycle, SOHO and THEMIS are expecting fireworks.
During a toast at my wedding, my Dad mentioned a quote he had once heard, “Shared happiness is twice the joy, and shared sorrow is half the pain.” That is most definitely true as it pertains to my husband and myself, but through your willingness to share in our sorrow, you have generously lightened our load. Someday when we see the beauty that is to come, I can’t wait to share that joy with you too.
updated: It's 8:43 p.m. Mr. Manic came home with a tin of Garrett's cheese/caramel mixed popcorn. I ate half the can. This made me EXTREMELY HAPPY THE MINUTE I STARTED CHEWING. I am an emotional eater. AND, I am sure I am getting my period for the third time in like 42 days. NOT GOOD.
The morning of Jake’s funeral arrived. It still did not seem real to me. I just moved through the motions. Some one told me to get dressed. I tried to get dressed but quickly realized I had asked my father, brother and father-in-law to remove anything baby related from the house – including my maternity clothes. I did not see a problem with wearing the black t-shirt and sweatpants that I had been wearing for days. However, my mom stepped in and dressed me in clothes I knew I would never wear again.
She wasn't even in town for 24 hours and yet, we had some of the best conversations I can remember that we have ever had. It was a whirlwind hopscotch visit... as it always seems to be with her...but it was an absolute precious memory in the making!
Hopefully they will give him some good pain killers so I do not have to deal with Mr. Grumpy Pants .... Oh, and no sexy nurse outfit this time hubby, sorry .
Try limiting fluid intake before testing, as well as holding your urine for 2-3 hours before.
ARAMA, I didn’t know that! =o
Silent partner (taking no part in management) Valener Energy Company (Toronto Stock Exchange: VNR) owns 29 percent of Gaz Métro Limited Partnership.
I watched the first episode when it originally came on and I really liked it, but for some reason I never set TIVO to record it and then once I had missed a couple, I figured I was too far behind to catch up. So I've just started watching Season 1 on Netflix and now I'm totally hooked. I always liked Bryan Cranston as a comic actor, but who knew he could bring this kind of intensity to a dramatic role without ever feeling like he's chewing scenery. Brilliant!
This humongous burger was cooked up by the owners of the Ambrosia on the Spot Cafe in Sydney, Australia.
As if I needed my life to be any more hysterical. Really?? What’s not to laugh at? If I didn’t laugh like a deranged hyena, I’d cry until I was laughing…
2. Combine orange juice and the next 7 ingredients (thru vinegar) in a large bowl, stirring with a whisk to combine.
QVC’s international third-quarter results include $11 million of adjusted OIBDA loss compared to a $9 million loss in the prior year related to QVC Italy operations that launched in October 2010. Excluding the effects of QVC Italy, international adjusted OIBDA would have increased 7 percent and adjusted OIBDA margins would have decreased 99 basis points for the quarter.
Only for her to see her self efforts was in vain , one of the hinderances of church or community life is pragmatism when our work in the the lord only causes us to compare or critices other peoples application or lack of it.
Especially in regard to celebrities. It seems that celebrities are either upheld as icons or vilified. I know that when you become a public figure, much of your life becomes open for scrutiny -- but still. What we tend to forget is that these people aren't angels or demons. They might be famous, but they're still just people.
The next few days were perfect – she was doing much better than expected. Although her brain showed a slight bleed, we were assured that it didn’t look like it was going to spread and that it was normal in preemies. All of her organs were working and they even started her on pedi-lite a few days after birth. She was the miracle of the NICU – all the doctors and nurses were coming to visit her. She was funny and spunky and full of life. My husband and I were able to change her tiny diaper, take her temperature, swab out her mouth, and help the nurses. We were so excited to be able to do these things. We had yet to be able to hold her so doing things to help take care of our girl felt wonderful.
Because like our love, that bird was cooked painstakingly– not too fast and not too slow at the right temperature. Standing watch, we will tend to this love with unfaltering care–
Flavor is always important when talking about an espresso coffee bean. Some want their espresso more bitter than others. You simply need to taste the various beans and their espresso to understand what you like. You also need to think about power. How strong do you want the espresso to be?
* Inside exclusive gated village
Company spokesman Alexander Westrell dismissed concerns that cash machines across Stockholm would run out of money, saying the cash depot resumed operations late Wednesday.
It is interesting to see the reactions of my co-workers when I told them that I don’t really celebrate my birthday. They actually gave me a cake. Funny thing is, I really did not know how to act when I got it. I was not surprised, as we already have the habit of buying cakes for our teammates on their birthday, that it becomes expected. So I said “Thanks!” and proceeded to put it back in the box.
“Paper was to the urban revolution what iron was to the industrial revolution,” says Scott Bennett in ‘The Golden Stain of Time’, his brilliant essay on periodical preservation. By 1851 Britain was the first country in the world where more people lived in towns than in the countryside. Paper became ubiquitous – for advertisements and announcements, for religious evangelism and for wrapping food. As the move towards universal literacy gathered pace, newspaper proprietors began buying larger areas of the Canadian forests.
Dear 13 Year old Me,
with words written on the walls
one banana
In life, there are two ways of living; there’s living like it’s your last day every single day, and then there’s just surviving, casually strolling through life like it means nothing! No way! I want a hell of a lot out of this life. I want success and freedom and fortune but most of all, I want happiness. I want to feel like I mean something to someone in a professional and personal sense. I want to make a difference in other people’s lives. I want to feel that if I died today, I’d have given it everything! I don’t want any regrets.
Coming to the end of a challenging week… I don’t know what it is, but sometimes I just seem to find it tough to fit it all in. In terms of food, I’ve been right on track, but when it comes to my usual workout routine… I’ve been off the pace a bit. Maybe that’s how it should be though… when things are too routine it’s not always a good thing. I played hockey last Sunday, did an hour of yoga on Monday, played hockey again Tuesday, rode my spin bike for over an hour Wednesday, played more hockey Thursday (which was intense with only 1 sub!), and took yesterday off. Well, other than my 6 consecutive chin ups and a second attempt to duplicate the demonstration which only made it to number 5… At the end of my shift at work is not when I’m at my optimal in terms of performance it seems. First thing in the morning seems best! I guess looking back, my week wasn’t a loss… just different.
Recept: Oh dear, it's on my desk. I guess I forgot to read it.
"Well 'kinky' is less judgmental." We both smiled. Still playing the word games, both of us. "So, neither of you ever wanted anything... unusual. Until, perhaps, he started getting ideas from elsewhere?" I suggested. "Like, maybe from magazines, and who knows what -- or who -- else?"
Who joined together for a different life
If serving cake all at once, spread cream over cooled cake and serve. Otherwise, keep cream in fridge and put a scoop on each piece as you go.
The girls are extremely proud of their "royal clothing." I think the color is quite beautiful and I'm eyeing the last bit of the powdered dye that we have left in the jar for myself someday.
56 minutes of running and my first 10k in Turkey was over. I think I'll do it again. Antalya, March 4th.
This morning I didn't work on art for swaps...though I have many to finish for April...I worked on stuff...just for me...I wish I could show you guys pics, but alas the camera has no batteries. I did the start work, now just have to embellish, etc., to finish them. I did 5 atc's, 2 mini atc's (1.5 x 2.5), a couple of Moo's (1.25 x 2.75), and several mini tags that one of my swap partners sent me with a swap. I also had a chance to mount one of my ink blot projects. I am so at peace...clear mind and happy with what I accomplished. I'll be posting them up as soon as I'm finished making them pretty.
The Crowfield Curse is a story that will appeal to fans of Catherine Fisher, Dianna Wynne Jones, Susan Cooper and Steve Augard.
Have you ever seen a cool umbrella? If so, please describe it to us.
At last—far off—at last, to all,
+Jesus did not have power to raise himself up. God had to raise him up, as the author of Acts says.
Bless You My Son 2:00
Moving along, in one month, I will be finally moving to a new place with a friend of mine! It’s a small duplex, but it’s nice inside and we have the liberty of painting, gardening, hanging stuff, etc. It’s also much closer to my work, closer to a lot of friends, closer to downtown of the city, closer to alternative transit systems (rail trolley and buses, so to speak), closer to just a lot of things I’ve been wanting to be closer to.
This series continues, as promised! I've added a new tab up at the top which explains what I'm doing here and all that.
The third story is the only one not to feature Alan. In it we get to see what his mum’s life is like, creeping out of bed early in the morning so as not to wake Robert and then heading off to the local school where she works as a cleaner. When Robert was made redundant for a while she was the sole breadwinner but now he’s taken a course and decided to set up shop in the High Street fixing watches and clocks. Like most of the pieces in this volume there’s not much of a story here but that’s not the kind of story Andrew writes; these are slices of lives which is another reason why this feels like the skeleton of a novel but I won’t labour the point because I like this style of writing very much. It feels less contrived than more carefully structured pieces; more real. Lives aren’t neat and so stories about people’s lives shouldn’t be neat either.
I also got some cheapo games for them to play before hand. A bowling game, some peg games, a tic tac toe game. Stuff to keep them interested while everyone gets there. Time fillers, you know. I got those organized too.
267I waste the matin lamp in sighs for thee,
Parents with full time (live in or out) nannies, this is just for you:). It’s a wonderful feeling to be at peace of mind knowing that you have someone highly professional, with excellent expertise in the nanny Industry. You trust her with your most prized possessions, your children. Better yet, your children love her and have an ongoing blast with her. Sometimes people, even you look at your awesome upbeat energizer bunny and wonder how she’s able to keep up so well all day long smiling and having continuous fun! She even works when the children are napping or having quiet time. Money well spent huh?
So Gabriel is really learning how to pull the strings and push the right buttons. When I scold him, he gets all sad and walks over to me and gives me the kiss face--the kid knows I'm a sucker for kisses. Tricky, tricky, Gabe!! He also knows I'm always down for a snuggle. I started noticing that he would cling to me and get all snuggly when we would leave a place and go to put him in his car seat. What a punk!! He doesn't want to get in the car (because who knows how long he'll be stuck in his (albeit awesome) car seat?) so he wraps his arms around me, lays his head on my chest and gets the most adorable look on his face. Man, he is goooood.... (and mom's a SUCKER!!)
As another example, a large company might want to try and compete with a lower cost company that is trying to edge into their marketplace; for example, a Defense contractor making a GPS receiver might fear a commercial competitor's cost advantages. They might want to change their entire approach to design of a product, taking more risk, instead of exceeding their requirements by large margins, they may try to just meet them. Instead of a receiver that will work from deep winter in Antarctica to the worst of the Sahara, they decide to make one that would work for a day-hiker. When they try to do it, the company's process manuals haunt them, and internal organizations, desperate to prove they are adding value, force the "low cost" program to adopt the same high-cost approaches they use in all of their products. This destroys the attempt to lower the cost and ensures the failure of the program.
That's right as Paul McCartney and Wings. And we collectively went into a dreadful acapella version of Mull of Kintyre. It was never broadcast of course, but we added it to our set list after that. We did it as the encore at the Lyceum, our first major headlining gig. We’d always choose two different keys, Andy would sing one part and we would play the other… it was all rather confusing. And that was our encore.
346*** 7. “Xenophon, the Trial of Socrates, and the Proper Response to the Prospect of Death.” The Greek Star, Chicago, Illinois, October 4, 2001, p. 2. (Source: Item D/V/4/2001, below.) See, also, Item B-15(projected), above, pp. 140-53 (2002)
1tsp ground ginger
Thoroughly enjoyed navigating with the charming character Zack as he unfolded his trials and trivilations (sort of speak) in one of the world’s “salacious undergrounds”, Roppongi. I appreciate this much on point novel of how life could be like, as I have lived in undergrounds myself and could definitely relate. If Roppongi shall become a movie, it will be a great compliment to BLOW and The King of New York.
On joining online contest we lost on some, but we also won big time on a few of the contests. Last year was the luckiest year for both of us. We had won on several contests and because of those prizes we had paid off some of our long time debt. I do believe in this saying wholeheartedly, "Share your blessings with others." Whenever we receive a blessing we never fail to give back something to other people, to church or to charity.
but they won't fit because of the raised faucet.
The group has recently had a workshop with Netron about the general design of the application. The group presented our mock-up and received some feedback. A few minor adjustments will be made, but the general design is pretty much completed. This is still just a mock-up to showcase functionality however, so there is still a lot of work to do on the graphical design. The plan is to present some design ideas to Netron, receive some feedback and get some help from the professionals once we agree on a look.
The amount of booking requests and the money I could make if I went full time keep rolling around in my head. For all my liberal hippy bullshit, Labour views and Commie leanings, I find the thought of making that much money exciting. I keep day-dreaming about that flat in London. About lazy days, spent being this exciting, mysterious person that I could never actually be.But I want it; I want to disappear. Home keeps calling, and all my conversation is vague and evasive. I don’t want to think about them right now. The responsibility of being loved. I don’t want it. I talked to my Dad this morning, and he said he missed me, he never says stuff like that. The feeling’s mutual, but I don’t want to do anything about it. Just stay missing, stay missed. So selfish.
Where the mind is without fear and the head is held high;
Monday, 4/23: 5 hours! (The explanation mark was noted in my journal. I must have been impressed that I fell asleep)
This one seems to have started a most interesting exchange that got Aunty Belle so flustered she didn't produce one of her own. Humorous but we miss her participation. Sure would like to get my own flux capacitor working.
A unique feature of traditional Chinese medicine is the meridian system. Chinese doctors viewed the body as regulated by a network of energy pathways called meridians that link and balance the various organs.
The selection of what kind of liver pate to use wasn’t that complicated since Mommy Ryan had a block of duck liver mousse in her fridge. She is a Ryan after all, and odds are that if you look in a Ryan fridge or freezer there will be some form of liver product somewhere. Makes choices in these situations easy.
Mulla rusketus kesti vähän yli viikon, ja sanoisin että 1-2 suihkun jälkeen se oli parhaimmillaan ja ihanan luonnollisen näköinen ♡
Anyways, awhile ago I came across Marianne Williamson’s “A Return to Love”. It’s a book about what she learned in “A Course in Miracles”, and let me tell you it’s a fantastic read, or listen if you have the audio book. After listening to the audiobook once or twice, I started to put it on at work and listening to it fairly often to really let it sink in. Now in the past few weeks I have been putting it into practice, and I will say that it has blown my mind.
It is easy to fall into a pattern of behavior where we ignore the problem, and the family member, because it is just too painful to address. But is ignoring the person, the answer? Hardly. In fact, all we are doing is keeping ourselves from happiness, and in the process making others just as unhappy. Case in point: One of my relatives was for whatever reason was estranged from her father and stepmother. For the life of me, I can’t remember why. I guess they found a reason to be upset at one another, and fell into a pattern of ignoring each other, allowing stupid issues to rob them of a beautiful close bond of love. Tragically, this beautiful person died in an accident before that stupid argument was resolved… how sad, how tragic, ..how permanent. (Sorry to back up the hearse, but this is reality) Her father has spent the better part of 25 years, grieving his dear daughter, and doing the “would have, should have, could have” game. Are any of you out there in similar circumstances? If so, what is so important, so earth shaking, that you can’t reach out to those loved ones, and put the issues to bed once and for all?. Will it take a death to make you finally see how really silly those issues were? Would you even remember what it was that caused the rift? What could possibly be so important that it causes you to finish this sentence…I don’t talk to my father because…I don’t talk to my daughter because… My mother is dead to me because..” Will it take loosing those loved ones in death to make us finally wake up and realize that while one has breath in one’s body, there is nothing more important than family? In the case of my dear beloved, her children continued to suffer long after her death. Her dad so grieved because of his failure couldn’t face his grandchildren, and in the process, lost not only his daughter but a wonderful relationship with his grandchildren. Those grandchildren lost out not only a mother, but grandparents to keep the memory of their mother alive..I guess the point of this very heavy blog post is, if you have something like this taking place in your family suck it up and seek out those lost ones, love them, and do not allow the fear of rejection to keep you apart. Don’t allow another day to pass with words unspoken.. tomorrow isn’t just another day. Why not make January 1, 2011 the day to put the past in a rocket ship and shoot it to the moon."
All the score lines are scored using a ruler and embossing tool (a scoring board could also be used), and a small hole punched near the point of one of the five-sided panels. I find it easier to tuck in the tabs to get the punch further down the panel, otherwise the hole is a bit too close to the top of the birdhouse.
“Like a pair of old shoes…,” she thought, smiling.
Please leave if you are not a patient reader.
So we continued chatting as the first course was served. And went on talking through the soup and the salmon (it may not have been salmon, I can't really remember. I'm just taking a wild guess here). And we were still talking through dessert. Once or twice my neglected friend Laura leaned over. 'Can you repeat that?' she asked him, 'I didn't quite catch it.' Startled, he did, and then we went on talking. And I forgot all about the camisole disaster, and the lurking ex, and just enjoyed myself.
One new trend that I've been encountering among followers while dancing in close embrace is what I can only describe as a choke hold embrace. Their left arm is positioned such that the armpit is positioned against my right lateral deltoid or, even worse, my bicep. An immense amount of pressure is then applied to presumably achieve a strong connection. All I can say is 'Ouch!'. It feels extremely constrictive, especially when I'm trying to turn or even walk on the outside of the follower. Not to mention the pain I feel afterwards from straining against that embrace. Apparently there is a female technique meme going viral among teachers now: somehow the followers have to use their lats (back muscles) to achieve a good connection. I was informed of this by a follower who has a beautifully comfortable embrace, who has figured out how to get a good connection without squeezing the living breath out of leaders.
Here's a picture I took of Aaron at Intermission. He looks kind of menacing here, but I assure you, he was elated to be here. He's a big fan and I think secretly wishes he WAS Ben Folds.
Hordes of the Red Butcher - Norvell Page
1. Portobello Belle
This world is sometimes filled with darkness as black as the terrible skies over Joplin that day. We’ve got to find the light. Not only did Will discover the light for himself, but even now in death his time here shines for the rest of us to see.
Defence attorney Geir Lippestad believes that it’s the responsibility of the court to determine the information presented in the new report, and not the media.
And considering that you didn’t post my comments, I can only assume that your feelings were hurt. So what are you, Miro, holding fast and staying true to? You are running from a contrary opinion, you are running from a challenge, you are hiding from criticism.
I choked when I heard the estimate today. We all did. It wasn't that the part was sooo astronomical. It was the many hours of labor. There goes my dreams for my new dishwasher and refrigerator. Out the car door they go. (Get it? Out the door. Out the car door. Ha. Ha.)
We've canceled our trip to Spain (we were supposed to leave tomorrow), so we're in London until next week when we go back to Norfolk for a few days, then we're in London again until October 20 when we go to Switzerland for 5 days to visit Patrizia and Alexandra (they're the ones who stayed with us last summer). At the end of the month Lynn is coming down to London with her daughter, Milly, so I'll get to meet a fellow unschooler and blogger which will be awesome. Then we head home on November 1.
Meanwhile, any suggestions gratefully received.
The last twelve years of her life were hampered by ill health. But she took a keen interest in my own nascent literary efforts, and when, in 2004, she was invited to the launch party of the first of my Lulu Baker books, The Truth Cookie, she was as excited as I was.
Aye. It's good to remember that there are far worse things than mere death, and there is nothin' much better than Life properly ealized (in regards to our Destiny), and all that it brings (Hope, Faith, Love, Truth, Nobility, Honor, Goodness, eauty, etc.)
After 1 minute:
The next steps will entail actually piecing together and building the binder! Creating our checklists and templates. I will start plugging away at those to begin sharing more FREE templates next week!
by southern rains or footprint on the ground,
Read on for Kole's Interview with Aaron Karo:
OH DEAR LORD
Again, I do not write this blog to dictate, but rather to share my experiences, and hear yours.
And of course there is lots of rubber to choose from too if you just love rubber stamps.
Your sweet caresses as your hands followed the curves of my body
This look is more traditionally male but elegant nevertheless and "rustica"
~ the portrayal of magic, magical creatures, and magical practices or practitioners on television and in film
The most efficient way to kill -
I used to have a copy of Golden Salamander that I got as a freebie with a Greek newspaper years ago, and it was a fairly ropey transfer. However, the film has just recently been released in the UK on DVD by Odeon. The disc isn’t a perfect one, there’s a softness to the image here and there, and a few speckles. Having said that, there are also stronger sections where detail is much better defined and print damage is generally minimal. Extras are a selection of trailers for other Odeon titles, a photo gallery and a booklet of liner notes. I’m not going to claim that this movie is a classic just waiting to be rediscovered; there are the issues with scripting and structure to take into account. Still and all, it is a good mid-range effort that has more than enough plus points in its favour to earn it a recommendation.
but before you leave Jakarta. don’t forget to brush off all the unnecessary burdens from the past. draw a clear line between you and your previous lover. you know where your going, but he doesn’t. so let him know, that you know you’re not meant to be with him. for real.some jerks will try to get in your way. some from the past will still tempt you. you’d fall for one of them in March at a party, but that’s okay. cause somehow, that night wouldn’t go so smoothly, so that’s your cue to take a bow and leave.
You know what? I'm female, and I'm not a particularly big fan stories where romance is the dominant element either -- that DOES NOT MAKE ROMANCE BAD, or inherently less worthy than books that are all wit, or all humour, or all adventure, or all deep introspection (sorry, I've just been seeing the implication that romance writing is less than worthy for MONTHS and have been meaning to yell about this for a while. I think I tweet-yelled a few weeks ago). It just makes romance not my cup of tea, and that's okay for me and all those writers who want to write their romance-dominated stories.
After the show we had dinner together which the girls also enjoyed. Thanks girls for a fun time! We loved it!
2 (10 ounce) packages refrigerated
I read this article today in the Morning Call. What really impressed me is that Donovan McNabb, although he is the undisputed starting quarterback, lobbied the team owner and coach to bring Vick to his team (keeping in mind that in Vick’s prime he was one of the league’s best quarterbacks). His reason? To quote McNabb, “I believe in second chances. I believe everybody deserves a second chance and I have strong faith in God that He forgives our sins and gives an opportunity to move on in a positive light to continue to inspire others.” Way to go, Donovan. Well done.
Chest pain related to the gastrointestinal tract: Problems related to the stomach, intestines, gallbladder, or pancreas can spread or even begin with pain in the chest.
A week later I told him
EMILY WATSON / Janet Leach – “APPROPRIATE ADULT” (Sundance Channel)
So far, the response to this new line has been phenomenal, and we haven't even shown you the whole collection yet!
“STORM CORROSION is the long-discussed and highly anticipated collaboration between two of the current music scene’s most innovative and multi-talented artists; Porcupine Tree’s Steven Wilson and Mikael Åkerfeldt of Opeth. The pair have been friends since the early ’00s, when Wilson co-produced Opeth’s revered ‘Blackwater Park’ album.
that no prominent Democrat, whether he holds public office or not, has
The nine men from Rochdale were yesterday convicted of abusing five vulnerable teenagers after plying them with alcohol, food and small sums of money in return for sex. However, the true number of victims, who were "passed around" by the gang, is likely to be nearer to 50, police have admitted.
This is Maura enjoying his company. They had a good conversation.
As the beer warms I’m getting more hop aroma and flavour; a pungent, dirtier hop flavour that could be coming from that simcoe. There’re are no faults in this beer, it’s very clean and tidy, I’d guess a California ale yeast strain is at work here. And as it warms further it’s getting better and better, that hop flavour is coming through stronger, I’m getting a floral quality to it now – something along the lines of cut flowers, and then there in the finish there’s a grainy, biscuity flavour coming from the malt. I’m really enjoying this beer as I empty the glass.
Now i don't know about you ,but i could really use this set!Good luck!ends feb 4th at noon!
The individual leaving the guild would feel they are justified in leaving no matter what the reason. The player leaving for greener pastures feels they deserve those pastures, likely because they are better than the other raiders in the team because they produce more dps or fill a valuable role like a healer. Wugan the Raid Leader might disagree. So might Akandra the Officer or Matticus the Guild Master. But none of that impacts on the viewpoint of the individual.
December 23rd already!
I indulge once in a wild and I keep the portion small, the emotional eating is going down.
Therapist: You are not ruined! Moving would not be running, it would be moving… just until the coast is clear. You are fighting, that is not running. Standing strong sometimes means getting safe so you can continue to be strong. You are not ruined. I know that was out of order, but needed repeating. He can and has hurt you, but he can’t ruin you. He can only ruin himself and his chances of having a good relationship with his daughter. You are just right. Regarding money, housing, so on. Crime Victim’s Reparations helps with relocating, legal fees, counseling fees (not sure about in home therapists, sorry), and other stuff. – What do you keep almost typing? You are quiet and then type and then stop.
Distinguishing Features: OFFBEAT WIT
Yield: depends on the size and configuration of your waffle iron
5) I love musicals. I grew up watching grease, west side story, sound of music, etc over and over again. I even love the sequels, and yes, Grease 2 is a great film!
I was not too keen on the joke about the turd in the loo, which would not flush away, or the joke about rape.
There are two sorts of hockey played in our household; Basement Hockey, consisting of regular sticks and a classic orange hockey ball. We use a clothes-drying rack turned on its side as a net, and a goal crease made from hockey tape on the cement floor. Then there’s Upstairs Hockey, consisting of small hockey sticks and a soft ball that can’t possibly damage anything.
waking the fish the ducks
This is post-punk at its finest ladies and gents. Plenty of rock, punk, and experimentation rolled together, with odd vocals to top it off. The vocals are probably the only part I could see people having a problem with, but really, everyone should check this out.
From our family to yours, Happy Holi-gays!!!!!!!
What is of interest here is the other story; of what really happened behind the musical talent.
Yes, the Bible calls people fools, who say there is no God. (Psalm 53:1) And some won’t believe. The Bible says the natural man can’t receive the things of the Spirit, because they are foolishness to him. (1 Cor. 2:14)
He still refuses to ask for mercy. He chose not to appear before the Arizona Board of Executive Clemency earlier this month.
AL Central:
Naked souls in transition
Last year I kept it in a bin, but this year I'm just trying it in a big pile in the corner of the garden.
McLaren Vale
This sort of story pattern is explored in several other stories in this collection. In the second story, "The Will," Miller tells a story of a boy's faith and of time traveling gone wrong. Near the end of this story, the boy Kenny's plight is summed up succinctly in this paragraph:
St. Dymphna, on the other hand, assists those with mental and nervous disorders.
Saturday H had a couple accidents for Jeff in the evening. And Sunday they did diapers with being out of the house 1/2 of the day for showings & such. But we have come an incredibly long way in, what, a week? Especially considering I didn't think Logan would get this til he was 5! And really this wasn't even our agenda. It wasn't on my plans until July. But they totally took the lead on this one & I'm not about to deny them & miss out on our perfect opportunity & possibly make it harder on us later.
Timothy Aaron Haviland, 41, Oceanside, N.Y.
Another thing. Our party’s agitators pay 600 to 800 marks a month [in travel costs] to strengthen the Republic. Is it not proper for the Republic to cover these costs by providing them with railroad passes? Who of you thinks that we should throw our own small change to the Jewish Dawes railroad when the Republic longs to help us out?
Trimble County High School is located in Bedford, Kentucky. The mission of Trimble County High School is “to empower the faculty, students, parents, and staff to grow, compete and excel in today’s post secondary environment.” Check out the TCHS News Page and the District website to see what’s happening in Trimble County schools where “It’s about every student, every day.”
Stilton Cheese, Celery, and Pulled Bread
Thing is about vulnerability, you can't selectively numb out of it. You can't numb yourself to what makes you feel bad without also numbing yourself to what makes you feel good. Plus, pretty sure feeling vulnerable means you're alive, and human. Probably. Of course, I numbed out once and totally screwed myself into thinking I was going to die. At any moment. Never having enjoyed a single insanely bizarre fetish. Well, I wouldn't call it insane.
I gave it two coats, but that was only because of the detail and and having to spray from different angles. It only took one to cover it, I just needed too many angles for one.
1 stick unsalted butter, softened
At Lawn Fawn, we love stamps that are truly one of a kind. All of our stamps feature original designs that have been created just for you; even our fonts have been customized to perfectly coordinate with each set. And to give you the best stamp experience possible, our stamps are
room for romance. Willing to do anything to help her son come out of
RANGERS REALISM
To be honest, at this time in my life my paycheck barely covered my bills, let alone extras. But I reasoned that what I'd spend over one or two nights out at some lame bar with a bunch of predatory losers could cover a whole month's subscription to eHarmony. And if, in that month, I found no one of interest, then I would chalk it up to experience and move on.
Helen Lewis-Hasteley, assistant editor at the New Statesman said:
Those who assume young adult fiction is merely about good story-telling would do well to check out this book. At only 180 pages, it’s a quick read, but Woodson has a voice and prose style that easily rivals—and perhaps exceeds—that of many well-known literary fiction authors. I’m curious as to how Hush compares with the rest of Woodson’s work, and I’d love for those of you who’ve read her other books to share your recommendations!
* 1 vanilla bean, split lengthwise and seeds removed (reserve pod
Chalupa (pork and pinto beans already in freezer) served over shredded lettuce with tomatoes, avocado and Spanish Rice
Are only reached by anguish and by pain;
“Even to get groceries?”
Truett, our Golden Retriever/White Shepherd now has some new babies to obsess over. He’s as worried as the Mother Hen when it comes to his little chicks — and so are we. That’s why last night I dropped a towel over the mom and babies and put them all in a safe, secure “nursery” inside our workshop where no hawks, weasels or other unwelcome creatures can get them.
See the grain lay scattered
I could go to for support,
Second post for me today. For my Teapot Tuesday/For Your Inspiration challenge card, please scroll down one post.
Fornäs, Johan (1995) Cultural theory and late modernity London: Sage.
Email: help.worldtechguru@mail.com
Hulk Hogan (Mr. Nanny)
So these are exactly some of the inspirational subjects I want to share with my readers. Today I attended a conference hosted by FIWAL, Federation of International Women’s Associations in London. The conference was on the topic of Social Entrepreneurship.
Or there's this residence:
Lips muttering “al mal tiempo, buena cara”, so wise,
But from now on filled with fuel
A: Decades ago, pulp writers learned to write while on the job. Early books by many of the greatest mystery, fantasy, sci-fi, and romance writers, weren't very good. But getting paid allow those writers to improve, and become the masters we now revere.
Some patients with SAD undergo light therapy session two or three times a day, others only once. The time of day and number of times treatment is administered depends on the physical needs and lifestyle of the individual patient.
To announce the coming of light;
EVERY SINGLE PERSON AND ORGANSATION IN THE WORLD THAT EVER SUPPORTED THE ANC AND THAT STILL SUPPORTS THE ANC HAS BLOOD ON HIS HANDS AND IS EQUALLY CRIMINAL AND IS AS MUCH A TERRORIST AS THE TERRORISTS THEY SUPPORTED.
I bought my first pair of skinny jeans about three years ago, and while I have repressed most of the memories surrounding that shopping experience, I recount just enough to know that I was in no hurry to do it again. So much so in fact, that when the seams of my beloved skinnies began to fray, and the belt loops, weakened from continuous hoisting over my ever-expanding muffin top, ripped off, I continued to cling to those bad boys like Rose Dawson to an old door frame. I simply could not face the prospect of doing it again.
Thanks for stoppin by and best of luck to all of you who decide to submit an application.
Poppo: Yeah, he’s great, a hero of us!
* Go ride horses. My kids love that!
3 outside
The Grateful Dead was “sui generis” in more ways than one,
I think it has turned out the way I envisioned it, this personal adventure of blogging. I certainly have learned that blogging, with its quick commentary, the short "slice of life" story, is ideally suited to my writing style. I like that some folks think I am funny.....*I* think I am funny, of course, but then the voices in my head tell me many things. So it's nice to have outside confirmation that at times, yes, I can be funny.
German does well out of bank error: “Faced with the dilemma of a vast deposit in your account from a stranger, how many of us would toy with the idea, or perhaps go ahead with, sticking it into a high interest account to profit from the error until it, inevitably, gets corrected? One man has been told he can keep the €12,000 interest earned while it was ‘resting in his account’ overnight, after his bank mistakenly deposited €200 million. Named in German media only as Michael H, he sold shares last April for €20,000, but his online bank, Comdirect, accidentally put €200 million into his account – 10,000 times the amount he was expecting. Michael H then swiftly transferred €10 million of it into his current account in a different bank. And although Comdirect successfully clawed back all the €200 million, it demanded €12,000 on top – 14.4 per cent interest on the money he moved, according to German media Die Welt and The Local. A court on Thursday, however, ruled in favour of Michael H, after he sued his bank for taking the interest.”
And used these delightful MArie Biscuits that we find here,delightfull when dipped in black coffee ,drowned in buttercream and gorged upon........
Myself without reserve;
It is, of course, completely full of crap. 'Cuz it might be free to apply...but it ain't free to get in or get a copy. It's hundreds of dollars, and access by them to your bank or credit card account information. And once they have that, they have enough.
Maybe you want to explore a new destination on your honeymoon. There’s a cruise and a ship for you. Celebrating your wedding anniversary? Take a cruise with a honeymoon package to make it extra special. There is nothing more romantic than a cruise to an enchanting destination.
“Tooooommy, cooome baaack!”
Juliet (to Andrew): “I’ve been here all morning. It’s a little break in the educational system I like to call Saturday.”
I’m snake eyes
I’m astounded by people who have unquestionable faith, how bright it is for some of those people to see what others aren’t able to see, and yet how very often it is so bright that it completely blinds them to anything else.
Face life without…
and what I chose, actually, was the life of a chair!!
‘‘(i) use cybersecurity systems to identify and obtain cyber threat information to protect the rights and property of such protected entity; and
I love flax so far, lol. There is more but thats enough for now right! so, what are the cons? well.....
10. Despite everything, try to live gratefully; it’s contagious.
Once you've tied the knot, you can use your married initial on any and every detail at your reception including your wedding favors, cake, menu cards, place and seating cards and any other items you are planning on having.
The techies contend the broadcasters want to keep the white spaces for themselves until they can figure out how to make money selling them. The broadcasters say the tech giants are trying to score free spectrum space — unlicensed devices mean companies don’t have to buy expensive spectrum space that licensed devices require. Each side dismisses its opponent’s arguments as bunk.
She is still breathing normally, and there are no sounds of snoring, suggestive of an obstructed airway. This is unusual in someone who is unconscious from a head injury. I file that titbit away, and carry on looking. Her chest is clear, and the movements are still symmetrical.
Overall, I cannot wait to get back an try some more of their beers- definitely will try their other Belgian styles.
Beyond working with tools from differing traditions, another definition of eclectic stems from the type of neo-pagan who does not belong to an established lineaged framework such as British Traditional Wicca- specifically, Alexandrian or Gardenerian (the dominant flavour of witch in my neck of the woods). For many new pagans finding an initiatory coven can nearly be impossible, and fitting into one once you’ve found it, even harder. The solution that many come up with is simply resigning to the solitary life, or making up one’s own path and starting their own coven from scratch- something they are freely bid to do by new age authors. This is the path I’m on. While the group I’m in uses initiatory rites and even a degree system, our practice is Eclectic in that our ‘High Priestess’ is self initiated. The local pagan community has put us through the ringer, and while we are one of the few non-lineaged covens that I know of locally, we have earned respect of the most of the elders of the community. Although, it has been through a lot of hard work and determination (and we are still around after the ‘phase’ time period has well and truly lapsed).
IPHONE is expected to come with newest version ios6 with icloud & iTunes. Current sensus reveals that iphone5 is coming up with Laser keyboard in which you can have a mirror image of keyboard on your desk & you can work accordingly.
Actually, I wouldn't have made the statement in the first place. While the statement may be an attempt to bolster the no-motivation argument, it does so at the expense of does-not-teach. And we all know that does-not-teach, rather than no-reason-to-combine, is your best chance of winning an obviousness argument.
Rnds 16-24: Repeat Rnd 12. At end of Rnd 24, bind off and finish in ends with large-eye blunt needle.
O me unhappy!This all happens in like the space of what — 35 lines? This wouldn't have worked even if Shakespeare had named the Play Two Douche-Satchels of Verona, although that title would have been more appropriate. Eventually, of course, everyone ends up with who they are meant to be with: Julia's presence is revealed, Proteus is forgiven, Valentine is unbanished, Silvia is unraped, and weddings are planned!1! FAHHH-bulous!1! (It take another couple dozen lines to accomplish all of that.)
I had thawed some veal stock for another dish I was working on, so I took a bit of that and mixed it with the meat from the feet and reheated it in a small saucepan on the stove.
The question about William Boyland, along with a respondent's zip code, should help the pollsters understand the resonance of the family name, especially in the eastern portions of the State Senate district.
What happened in the hearts of Tony Perotta and Hope Williams after the affair was exposed and they went their separate ways? Did they struggle with memories from their past relationship, or with wishing things would've turned out differently? Was trust ever restored in their homes after their lives crashed and burned around them? Did they ever heal enough to enjoy their marriages as before, or were they even worse off after their sin was revealed?
In contrast, the Workers Party’s likely candidate for Hougang has been keeping a relatively low profile. Hougang residents said he was hardly seen in the estate except with WP Chief Low Thia Kiang occasionally. His Facebook page has also not been updated for a long time.
14. Fools Rush In
“Once we believe in ourselves, we can risk curiosity, wonder, spontaneous delight, or any experience that reveals the human spirit“. e.e. cummings
Thanks to all who stopped by, especially the dedicated few who stayed for the entire A-Z series!
#1) If all money owned by all American banks, businesses and individuals was gathered up today and sent to the U.S. government, it would not be enough to pay off the U.S. national debt.
- If they have a fever, take their socks off to help it break faster.
I pray our family never sells Beech Haven. After the boundless childhood I experienced, I feel cramped living on a one-third-acre lot and long for a place where my children can roam freely, like I did. Beech Haven remains the foundation upon which my appreciation for family heritage, homegrown food and environmental preservation developed. So much of it still flows through my veins. I hear it when the cicadas sing. I smell it when the magnolias bloom. I taste it when I bite into a fig or sweet pickle. I feel it when I wade through a cool creek.
and all were baptized into Moses in the cloud and in the sea;
I can see this taking off in a big Urban Outfitters kind of way, probably paired with a maxi skirt and braids.
● Business Efficiency Manager, Time & Material Management, 5 Years
Bières de garde (or beers to keep) are France's unique contribution to beer culture. Labelled as such (at least according to Ratebeer) was also Hommelpap by the microbrewery Ferme Beck in Northern France.
I'm excited to announce that I hit the minimum fundraising goal for my 3 Day Walk!!! We had an awesome Pure Romance party this past Saturday as a fundraiser and that topped me over the $2300 mark. Woohoo! This means I can actually get checked into the walk, however, NOW I hope to actually be physically able to do the walk.
Privately, I call him Ben because there are just the two of us locked in this battle, the man of the house being in complete denial. “It’s a mouse”, insists he.
2 Spools -Pearl Assorted Colored Stick Pins
A certain amount of it was, of course. 'Bad Romance' as a project really suited NaNo and it just so happened to come along at the right moment. There wasn't time for a lot of outlining so I was able to really go where the story took me. I was able, one way or another, to avoid anyone in authority notiving just how much I was shunning my PhD.
The sentiment from Woodware is mounted on one of SU's Four Frames in Pear Pizzazz and punched with the matching punch.
$1.50 off Glade Premium Room Sprays
Traquair House Ale 330ml $8.50 - Brilliant rich strong ale, with complex malt character & a touch of oak from fermentation vessel.
But this year, the good far out weighed the bad. A new blog, a new baby, new friendships and a personal strength gained through all those challenging experiences.
Registrations are NOT TRANSFERABLE.
guard, since that’s the intersection in front of the school. And ALL
If you’re an expert on something, go ahead and show that you know what you’re talking about. One of the reasons my novel Damn Straight, a story involving a professional golfer, won a Lambda Award is that I know golf, and let my years of (painful) experience inform the book. I felt I’d done a good job when reviewer after reviewer wrote, “I absolutely hate golf, but I love how Sims writes about it in this novel. …”
We didn't have a lot of time for sightseeing but we did make it to the Great Wall the day before we had to come back. I enjoyed that except for the gaunlet of trinket sellers you had to wade through to get up there. The tourist areas in Beijing have some very aggressive sellers who will literally grab you or get in your way so you can't get by without acknowledging them. We hiked a long way on the wall, maybe 3 kilometers or so (uphill) until we got to a place where the restored part of the wall ended. When we got back to the entrance the guide that brought us there seemed surprised that we went that far.
I mean, I’ve woken up to some weird things on television before, but I just assumed that was because we have a disgusting sense of humour in New Zealand and laughing about wee’s is hilarious for us. But no. America, once again, outdoes little old Aotearoa, and goes straight for the money shot by assaulting early morning viewers with a, well, money shot.
“Stop ‘N’ Swaps have hit at the right time. In this economy, they’re a great way for residents to find things they need without having to pay and they are reducing the amount of garbage that NYC generates,” said GrowNYC Executive Director Marcel Van Ooyen. “In fact, it’s a triple-win; in addition to economic and environmental benefits, they also build community as New Yorkers come out and meet their neighbors.”
European nation states that are facing financial tensions are those who most recently have had authoritarian regimes. Greece, the country in the worst position, has the weakest of democratic arrangements and was the most recently under the control of a military junta; then Portugal, still feeling the after-effects of Salazar; Spain is coping better with its Franco hangover.
But, I still don't think I'm going to be writing all that much in the coming days. Please be patient as I sort out my life.
I took a look at my current craft supplies to see if anything inspired me and with my Mod Podge, Acrylic spray and a small bottle of glitter I knew exactly what I could use these shoes for. A shoe makeover! So I went out the next day and purchased the biggest container of chunky gold glitter I could find. I'll give you a step-by-step process of how I did this DIY.
7. There are three stages in a man’s life: Tri-Weekly, Try Weekly and Try Weakly.
So, you know how we're supposed to be trying to get outta debt?
I feel the same way about my writing. Passion for the printed word did not boil in me at a young age, driving me to learn the craft. Far from it. I was a good student, but not because I studied and worked hard. I have a good memory. History was my best class. It combined my inherit interest in the subject matter with my ability to recall facts. I won my schools Daughters of the American Revolution award for American History as a Junior. I wasn’t in AP classes and I didn’t advance beyond community college. I simply love history. On my own I have read and studied for innumerable hours, focusing on the ancient and dark age eras in Europe.
Thy throne is on the mountain top;
Is it a Dream or is it Real?
The Mia isn't even in the same league as those cheap knock offs.
The International Festival of Creativity, also known as Cannes Lions, is the world’s leading celebration of creativity in communications. Founded in 1954, the Festival takes place every June in Cannes, France.
“This is not the case.” She reportedly added.
I received a console stereo for my 13th birthday. I thought I would pee my pants when I saw it. My best friend, Allison, was there when we walked in the house and there it was with a bow on top. It was the coolest-EVER gift from my parents. I still dream about that crazy stereo, sometimes.
Employment increased by 38,000 last month, the smallest increase since September, from a revised 177,000 in April, according to figures from ADP Employer Services. The median estimate in the Bloomberg News survey called for a 175,000 advance for May.
Hugger Mugger Yoga Experienced
Duh and sorry.
And surrounded by our super awesome dilapidated fence...
Bike race days don’t bother those of us who live out here (at least, most of us), but the pre-race training gets a little crazy. Packs of cyclists vying with trash trucks, Eyre buses, school buses and commuters using these roads as a way to avoid Rte. 32 can be a little daunting.
So this is me saying, awkwardly, um....hi. How are things?
19. Proud Mary—Creedence Clearwater Revival
Being Human ‘Hold the Front Page’ airs next Sunday in the UK on BBC Three at 9PM.
It all started rather innocently just before finals in December. I was a wee bit stressed over the thought of exam essays and needed a slight diversion. I began with a small farm and planted crops that were ready to harvest in24 hours. This was the beginning of my morning ritual which involved harvesting and then planting as I had my morning coffee and cigarette.
Today I spent about 10 minutes in the kitchen.
"A catechism with unctuous Solomon-like language the words of which rise gently like a dove chirp! chirp! to the regions of pathos and thunder-like aspects."
"Pods are the seeds of our imagination."
I really enjoyed them.
Let someone shout halleluiah!
pretty please.
Often completely harmless.
Framed prints size and availability
Lately work has kept me busy, tired and unattractive due to early shifts and the fact that I'm not allowed to wear much make up. I started getting too used to au naturel face and when on Sunday I had a chance to do full war paintings on my face again I felt like a drag queen each time I looked in the mirror lol.
So I’m halfway inclined to make my advice nothing more than “you know what, just keep doing what you’re doing – the letters, off-the-cuff short stories about alien rabbits, bizarre explanations of art projects, song parodies, actual songs, inappropriately handled essays, weird one-act plays, and all those emails about nothing at all – keep it up, yo, because it’s gonna happen. You’ll be a writer.”
Today when the inevitable question came "Mommy, can we go in the pool?" the answer was "Not yet, maybe later when we get back from the baby doctor." Now, "baby doctor" is a term that I used loosely to explain the traveling back and forth to my midwife's office. I'm sure she'd strongly oppose this practice, but it served my purposes at the time. I remember thinking while getting ready for my appointment how insignificant it felt. Just another quick check up, smack dab in the middle of a very long pregnancy. I pretty much just threw on a pair of denim capris, a pink t-shirt, threw my hair in a pony tail and headed out the door with my already large brood of children. I expected the whole thing to fly by so quickly that I didn't even bother to feed them lunch....after all they'd JUST eaten breakfast.
Right now, I have 2. Country Heels, my new romance novel and my yet to be revealed Steal Me Into Moonlight. It’s a vampire romance novel full of everything. My life is tied to my books. They’re what I always have when nothing else is certain in life.
(Still searching for a garbage can at this point.)
F. Deicer
What we need in this situation is some self-compassion. What does this mean? It means being kind to yourself, especially when you’ve made a mistake. Self-compassion has been suggested to lessen anxiety and depression. That shouldn’t come as a surprise to anyone who’s found themselves mentally replaying some miss-step. It can be exhausting! Mark Leary, PhD, a professor of psychology and neuroscience at Duke University says that “studies show that self-compassionate people are more proactive about looking after themselves. They’re more likely to take vitamins, practice safe sex, and go to the doctor when they’re sick.”
Thus when a fetus is 'viable' it is a citizen as it has passed that threshold (totally and absolutely temporal, bound in the material world) in which the life can be sustained without a direct umbilical cord attachment to the mother or host and can then develop normally outside of that host. At that point the full citizenship rights are with the fetus as it now gets absolute and full legal protection including the right to privacy and safe conduct within its host or via secondary means at a cost to the State or via designated charities willing to do this work.
What will replace God? The same being who will replace man; the Superman. Nietzsche’s masterpiece, Thus Spake Zarathustra, celebrates this new god.
At the end of the book I went in search of who would be in the next novel and I was happy to see it was going to be Amy and Will. I like that Dreiling is keeping with the theme of rakes and how the woman will be reforming them in some way.
When right-wing commentators note that ‘there is nothing Barack Obama would like better than to close Murdoch down in the US’, their assumption is one of a Democrat President trying to remove an opponent. In fact, it is more to do with Obama’s sense that Newscorp is already far too powerful and above the law in America. He will not have been reassured by recent events in the UK.
According to Dr. Butkus, the Wayne State University psychologist, “any significant change in behavior is generally a red flag.” A happy child who turns irritable, headaches, unexplained behavior, etc. are all symptoms. And parents shouldn’t just look at their own children.
For the first time in several years, my family is battling a headcold. As so often happens, a friend shared nice. First, one of us was sick. Then, two more. So, herbal treatments and cough syrup are helping us get through.
Now I've got to get around to quilting it. That part probably won't be as fast as the piecing, but I've got a month and a half!
(Mom was there too, but the photo I took of her turned out too dark to salvage.)
I wondered if he was thinking back to all the times at the store he asked for something and we gave him the line, we can’t afford that.
Last week, I overheard Seth playing on XBox Live - he was telling his friends that we had Oreo cake, that he loved it, and that his mom made it all the time. All of which are wishes on his part - I never even knew such a thing as Oreo cake existed. I didn't tell Seth I overheard him or ask him about it; he has always been a champion story teller. This past weekend, I came up with a recipe for Oreo cake that I'll try later in the week - white cake with crushed Trader Joe's Jo-Jo pieces mixed in, or deep chocolate cake (I haven't decided) and creamy Jo-Jo-flecked frosting. I want to surprise him with it, and I love that he doesn't know I overheard him. There it will be: an Oreo cake! (the no-high-fructose-corn-syrup version)
to appear, to innovate some of the rusted structures of spirituality. I can certainly agree with this sentiment in many ways, but it is essential to remember that real change begins within our own heart. The maha-mantra is a tool, a spiritualized lifestyle app, which allows us to come to the core of the real innovation and creativity of our true being.
Currently there are 5,144,269 immigrants living legally in Spain with current residency papers. Of those 2,476,334 come from the European Union, Iceland, Liechtenstein, Norway or Switzerland, and the rest, 2,667,935 come from countries such as Morocco, Ecuador, Colombia, China, Bolivia and Peru among others.
We may well remember the value of little open spaces, spots where folk may repair from the bustle of the street to stop and rest awhile ; very small spaces may serve such purposes. Playing places for children may often be secured in the centres of building areas, which without the making of an additional and costly road would be of little value for building purposes; points too where fine views are obtained, and where the sunset can be seen, can often be preserved by the devotion of a very small area of ground and would add much to the pleasure to be obtained in the district.
Their demand is mostly inspired by the notion called ideological illusion. Trying to create a parallel between Gandhi’s non-cooperation movement and that of inserting puritan reforms confirms the misguided principles with which the aam janta is led today.
Packy got his name by way of a local radio station 'name the baby elephant' contest. The winning entry was a play on 'pachyderm'. And so Packy was dubbed.
Of course, we went to the Jewel Room first. This is DD in a $5k necklace made of cut crystal and gold. It’s a low end item.
The rest of the time was mostly taken up with in house stuff. One of the fighters had lost his father over the weekend so the show generously allowed him the privacy of having a camera shoved in his face, presumably so he could cry in peace – with us watching. Tough it up man, this is the ultimate fighter. They did allow him to go to the funeral and come back again and continue. They know how to look after their fighters in the UFC.
The newspapers have been full of prisoner votes, ‘perverts’ (The Sun, Daily Mail et al) being allowed to come off the sex offender register and now, to inflame the blazer wearers of middle England, the outrage of leading murderers and rapists using the ‘hated European Human Rights laws’ to get benefits while in prison. Carl Gardner, author of The Head of Legal blog brings analysis to the fore with his question and blog post… Have lawyers really “cleared” the government to defy Strasbourg over prisoners’ votes?
* "The Pit and the Pendulum" by Edgar A. Poe
A typical 'street photographer' style can be recognized in Sternfeld's early and as yet unknown work, using a 35mm camera, to record everyday life in America. This work already contained the characteristics that made his later work so successful. In 1978, Joel Sternfeld began a long journey through the United States. For eight years he crisscrossed his homeland and recorded everything he encountered with his large-format camera. His investigation into the landscape and people moving within it resulted in the American Prospects series (1979-1983). In Stranger Passing (1987-2000) Sternfeld concentrated on people. He photographed them in an unambiguous way: from the same distance and looking directly into the camera. This series is a portrait of a society, comparable to the magnum opus of August Sander in the early twentieth century. Just as in American Prospect, there is evidence of a light absurdism as well as sympathy for those being portrayed.
Oh, I believe in yesterday (...... maybe because yesterday happened??).
I will still be there to help you relearn…help you bear the consequences of your then
Jamie Moyer has faced Michael Young, Dmitri Young, Chris Young, another Chris Young, Eric Young, Kevin Young, Ernie Young and, yes, Joel Youngblood.
I can't believe she sounds as good as she does, I swear, given the way she sounded before the surgery and immediately thereafter. She sounded SO incredibly weak beforehand, and her coloring was just wiped out. I swear, I thought for a second that this had all (finally) turned her hair gray.
Felicity sharply turned her head away and took in a quick intake of breath, but before she could begin to explain to him how much she felt betrayed and how stupid she was for having believed his little charade of sweetness and how good he was at faking genuine friendliness, all of these thoughts having come rampaging through her mind the split second he posed the question, he interrupted her and said, ‘No worries. Just giving it a shot. I do want to play with you, it’s just you’re pretty cute as well, so, you know. But never mind.’ He shot her another smile, the same as before.
Now a few words for the graduating class -
We will start with Thursday’s statement by the administrators. As usual, their statement is in bold with my comments beneath in plain text. As an added bonus their release was combined with the “au revoirs” of the first two employees to leave Ibrox under D&P.
I genuinely thought we had won the long argument on double-jobbing. It seemed the pressure had told, when in March this year the DUP anounced all but their Party leader, would give up their second seats. See the link below.
The point is, if you want people to accept the incest, you have to give them more of a reason for siblings to have sex than simply because they wanted it. People want lots of things that are not acceptable, but that does not make the thing acceptable to lots of people. As always, with writing, you need to figure out what your motive is for writing the scene before you can figure out your characters’ motivations. Are you trying to prove that sibling love is acceptable? That it’s inevitable under certain circumstances? That love is love wherever you find it? That you have the hots for your sister or brother and want society’s okay? Whatever you want to prove, you then have to write the scene with this objective in mind.
“It was my tribute to their proud, naked way of living!” she protested.
expected from.
Monday the 7th was my seventh stop and I was glad to wet my gullet at the Fiction Thirst Saloon. The proprietor Rhys was only about 15 or maybe 16 yrs old. So we drank sarsaparilla instead of whiskey. I reminisced about my childhood and I told him about The First Gunslingers I Ever Met, back in the days when things were still in black & white. One of them dressed All in Black & one of them wore Trowsers so Tight they Split & one of them was a Master of Disguise.
It's the part of me that thinks "I wonder where this goes" every time I stumble upon a new road.
Tue-AM: 1:14, 2500' ~ Green Mt.
“Floodwaters are already surrounding the Fort Calhoun plant. The river has risen 1.5 feet higher than Fort Calhoun’s 1,004-foot elevation above sea level, but the water is being held back by an 8-foot-tall flood barrier,” a report said on Friday.
waiting for him,
I didn't know whether to laugh or cry when I read this - but I chose to laugh - to help alleviate the stresses of the last few weeks. And I thought I'd take the laugher a step further by taking the piss out of the moron who wrote it.
A talk about Australian hops followed, and on leaving we were given a goody bag of small samples of various new, old and Australian hop varieties which I will no doubt return to at some point soon.
I live in Henryville, IN.
flowers-woc
When he returned from his climb, he was "ambushed" at the airport by a reporter who noted that the press was gathering information about his non Appalachian jaunt. When confronted with that bit of information, he held a press conference where he admitted to the affair.
First put the butter/oil in your food processor/mixer, stir at slow speed. The butter/oil will start changing consistency, slowly add the sugar. Let them mix together till the oil and the sugar reach cloud like consistency of whipped cream. Then add one egg at a time and keep mixing slowly. Finally add the flour mixture a little at a time, alternating with the milk, maintaining the slow mixing pace.
That’s what she said. Those were the rules. They were always the rules. Maybe I thought they were bull. Maybe I believed in them just a tiny bit. But overall, I wanted to see the ring for myself.
I just wanted to put that out there because she is truly amazing and that just made my whole month.
If you like to enter to win a case of underWAY to try, please leave a comment sharing "why you’d love to try underWAY and/or Smart for Life products."
Hmm, yeah, sometimes it would be nice if the things I put out on the Internet got seen only by the audience I'm picturing when I write them.
2012 is nothing more than a protracted repeat of the 2008 election cycle, and one is now realizing, when the money is gone, and the campaign is resorting to posting on blogs and new sites where every seemingly negative article on Romney is an invitation to use the “Mormon Card” , the desperation of the Romney campaign is now apparent.
I hope you've enjoyed my stitchy blast from the past! It's been nice to revisit some old stitched pieces... I'm quite keen to start a larger stitched project now but I have heaps of swops that I need to finish crafting for first! Mustn't get distracted!! Lol! I've spotted a couple of Jubilee samplers that I'd really like to stitch though, so I think I'll get the materials for those in ready for the summer when I'll have a bit more time!
I never dreamed my heart would make it,
But for my friends who've been here longer, the good-Samaritan-high has lost its appeal. They're tired of being bothered and just want to go about their business without someone saying, "Aahhh Eh-scu-zay-mwah, par-lay Ahn-glay?" and I can kind of understand their point of view.
The reading page is clear and customizable. Select a word or phrase and the menu offers to copy, highlight, add a note, bookmark or search for the word in the rest of the Bible. Bible Reader can also search Bible dictionaries in their library as well. Opening a note adds a floating window designed to look like a sheet of notebooks paper similar to the NotePad app. This notepad can be expanded to the full screen. The title is customizable and the heading includes the date created and last date modified. Tags may be added for faster searching and notes may be saved to categories.
RLR has kindly given me access once again to his collection. It was like a "kid in a toy shop" situation: it was hard to select tapes and at the end I came home with some 250 tapes to listen and eventually to transfer in the digital domain. Some of them will be shared here, possibly the most interesting ones.
It's raining again. (sigh) I was really enjoying the sunshine. Maybe it'll be back. Eventually.
Ink: Clearsnap (Stephanie Bernard Dye: strawberry) & Tsukineko (Versafine: onyx black)
And I wish I had that kind of faith.
Here is a list of the world's most ridiculous laws... no wonder lawyers earn so much!
Hi crafty friend:
Authentic souvlaki is served with a half a lemon and some extra Greek oregano sprinkled over the meat and potatoes. For a little healthier option, try using these oven fries.
Who gained from this decision, and in what ways? Did anyone make money (from consultancies, etc) from giving advice that influenced the decision? Was there other pressure? Was there a stitch up? Or – was it simply a dumb and costly decision?
Years later,
The Ragged Schools movement has been fairly well documented in a number of texts, but I've been unable to find any mention of either Edward Foster or his son, who described himself as an "Author Lecturer & Professor of Elocution &c." in the 1851 Census, having a prominent role in their promotion or growth.
“Yes, I’ll bring the evidence. See you in about thirty minutes?”
Frankenstein was created by a mad scientist.
Music that inspires you to write that song about that sweet little pretty thing you have on the end of your arm.
1 kissing
(Author’s Note: Three Word Wednesday this week offersthe prompt words Draft, Locate and Serenity, which brought to mind a story I wrote back in October 2010, Seeking Serenity. So this is a follow-up, of sorts…)
But Godl thought little of the noise. He rarely made any, as the fullness of his muscles and taut sinews testified to the creatures whose last vision in the world was the shadow of the jaguar.
legs are separate from torso and attached with disc and wire.
Zeke is my middle boy and along with Ross (Bass) and Jordan (Drums) they’ve put together a band called The Insights.
Pray, tell me, my love, for I do want to know
flat-leaf parsley - generous handful, roughly chopped
The cost of the flour used in one cake is a very small part of the total expense, and yet these few cents' worth of flour have more to do with the success of the cake than all the other ingredients.
Yeah. No explanation needed (we didn't start off well rested, okay?).
-Bateau El Alamein: A little boat deck terrace that is busting with pretty plants and flowers.
Who was never here, never there
CHARLOTTE ELLET (Soprano)
White pearls in the corners on the front of the card and done.
The kids thought it was Awesome!!!
BLITZER: Governor Romney, why are you the one person on this stage most likely to beat President Obama?
Mom: (after laughing really hard) We will have to get a bigger house.
“Put aside privacy - and the government has - the scheme is an astonishing waste of money. What problem does it solve that is worth billions?”
Maybe it is because we were there for nearly a month, unexpectedly grounded by the volcano in Iceland, but for the first time we left Texas without looking back. For the first time since we’ve been going back to Texas, I drove to the airport without the children crying and carrying on. My oldest daughter tuned the satellite radio to BBC’s Radio 1; she couldn’t wait to fly home and be reunited with her English friends.
Over brandy and Christmas pud’ Nirab turned his attentions to Uncle Dudley and beat him in the staring out game. Uncle Dudley began to cry like he does when drunk/emotional and got the better of. Then Nirab nearly choked on the penny in the pudding and everybody laughed, apart from Mother, who beat Nirab’s back rapidly, squealing and trying to get it up…
But one Tea Party beef is actually related to tea.
July – TBA (Europe -LMS)
Duncan: I like the animals, but I love the humans.
Only one man can save her-a man who claims to be a fellow oceanographer. He will seek to gain Melis’s trust, getting close to her secret and her life. But what this enigmatic man really wants, Melis may not discover until it’s too late. Because whoever is after her knows her nightmare intimately, and soon she will be forced to relive them all over again.
4. Chicago Cultural Center: In the shadow of sparkling new Millennium Park and the legendary Art Institute of Chicago, the Chicago Cultural Center sometimes gets overlooked but it’s a very regrettable mistake. Boasting the world’s largest stained glass Tiffany dome and gleaming Carrara marble, the cultural center is an architectural marvel in its own right but there’s so much more. Art exhibits, concerts, films, lectures and festivals are presented almost every day of the week and all for free.
“There must be wide and prolonged awareness campaigns to educate the public, and standard operating procedures for officers to produce their authority card bearing their name, rank and number.”
Heat some vegetable oil in wok and sauteed ingredients for gravy (dressing) until fragrant. Add a little water if the gravy is too dry. Add all the vegetables and stir fry for a short while. Garnish with peanuts and sesame seeds and serve.
Tips: Best to go with a group.
In the future I plan on using these techniques to survive conventions:
That is about to change. The USPTO and the EPO (which observes the IPC) announced today that they are working on a joint classification system that "will be more detailed than the IPC to improve patent searching. As a result, the two offices would move closer to eliminating the unnecessary duplication of work between the two offices, thus promoting more efficient examinations, while also enhancing patent examination quality."
Were this contest to take place in St. Louis, I’d give the rams the edge, even though their massive horns would do little damage to men who have peglegs. Since the game will take place in the Raiders’ arena, I anticipate an entire flock of sheep walking the plank.
Why not??
Get out some paper and crayons or markers, or magazines to cut up and glue. Make a picture together that depicts the setting you discussed.
Every time I like you
shadow of illness.
Hello Everyone,
This weekend I exhibited at Comica Comiket, and I have a few thoughts about it.
Speaking of the devil again, he’s brooding over Ga Young’s confession in his office and Anna’s words. He drinks. Yeah, like that’s a solution. Finally, he picks up his phone. Ga Young is stirred awake when the phone vibrates and finally picks it up. He asks how she’s feeling but there’s a silence that follows and he finally mutters, “I’m sorry. It’s better if you don’t come (back). I’m sorry.” Tears fall from Ga Young’s eyes as she puts the phone down in shock.
First, I owe a lot of moral support to Ian Williams, a.k.a. Graveyard Parade. It was the aforementioned lengthy conversation with him that initially forced me to face this problem directly. Also to his bride-to-be, The Official Bailey, my long-lost twin and the principle benefactor of the demonstrative affection that I discussed earlier. The two of you were powerful enough as individuals. It has been astounding in the most incredible way to see what the combining of such awesomeness can do. Kudos.
Address: 27 College Street, Te Aro, Wellington 6011
From Counterpunch, Ehrenreich, who, along with Jonathan Kozol and the late Joe Bageant and a vanishingly few others, tells the true story of American poverty more clearly than anyone else explores how we punish the poor::
“But that’s never worked in the past! History has proven that!” Kayla exploded unexpectedly. She believed that they would die as a shining example of the persevering human spirit–not as heathen charlatans!
Secondly, it is necessary to stand firm in the defence of vital practices and institutions as they come under increasing threat, not only the rule of law but also academic freedom, independent civil society, a free Press, an independent legal profession and prosecution service, and independent courts. It is also necessary that organisations other than business come to the public defence of the free market system, private enterprise, and entrepreneurship.
"Antony Funnell: Dr Kevin Grazier, an interplanetary scientist at NASA's Jet Propulsion Laboratory, a former science adviser for the TV series Battlestar Galactica and also a certified science fiction nut. No offence of course.
Measure Mrs. Carroll!! Please note that this template is not to scale ;) HA!!
Most personal growth books advocate auto-suggestion and positive thinking as a route to genuine change and Wake Up And Live! is no exception. It stands apart from the competition, however, because it is written in plain English and you get the strong impression feeling that Brande felt compelled to write this book out of genuinely altruistic motives.
The other way to categorize these might be according to permanence: the borders that are more transitional and in movement tend to be neutral to positive, while the borders that suggest permanent change are characterized as negative. This would seem to hold for the wider novel. Consider that the twinned villains, Kafka's father and Johnnie Walker, are in the business of producing fixity, in the form of sculpture and distilling souls into an all-powerful weapon.
This comes as no surprise really. In their short time on both record and stage, Cut Off Your Hands have built both their fanbase and media hyperbole on a slew of melodic and downright memorable offerings. From the romantic naivety of songs like Oh Girl, to the speeding, hyper-love balladry of the pop-paean Still Fond, the four-piece have shown they’ve got what it takes to grab the world by it’s collective scruff and shake them into spinning, lovesick action. Happy As Can Be continues this impressive mode.
GINGRICH: I was meeting Rick’s desire for grandiose ideas. But –
To all my friends who ask me about weight loss.
“I know it seems odd, but I really have no idea why I’m here, or where here is. It might be some sort of amnesia I guess.” Derrek lied outright; he knew all too well that everything here was wrong. He was likely dreaming or worse, dead.
Participants who complete the session successfully will receive relevant diplomas, certified by the NATO’s Public Diplomacy Division and Ministry of Foreign Affairs of Azerbaijan.
After several decades, it has still not worn off. I regret not showing courtesy with a friendlier look. As such, it is easy to understand why some police officers can look fierce, considering what they have to put up with.
one sweet handmade card,
Give a man a free hand and he’ll run it all over you.
Bernstein’s areas of expertise include federal and state economic and fiscal policies, income inequality and mobility, trends in employment and earnings, international comparisons, and the analysis of financial and housing markets.
Don't miss the call
Release Date: June 20, 2011
Aaaannnd! This is my final painting for the presentation tomorrow! So happy to be getting onto something new. Sick to bits of painting the studio really badly. I really got that perspective wrong but that’s what happens with those rules where you have to start in the middle with small shapes and do one shape at a time… The edges go wonky as.
Hope you have enjoyed my 5 tips for sewing this Christmas block. For more free patterns and other "how to" tutorials visit www.stitchingcow.com today. Have fun!
In September I registered for tax and finally got into running some workshops in December for myself and soon realised that my mobility problems would not make it impossible to teach. But as well as loving knitting and crochet I also love to help others unlock their potential and I wanted to find a way to make that happen. And eventually the idea of a social enterprise was born. The aims of the company are a bit diverse but the ethos is to reach people who are socially isolated or experiencing a lack of confidence or huge change in circumstances and offer them some hope through learning a new skill and unleashing some creativity. Its amazing to see people who come along telling me they’ve been told they’ll never learn anything mastering the basics and asking to move on to the next challenge. I suppose its my chance to give something back for the support and encouragement I’ve had along the way and an opportunity to say to others – “Don’t let anyone tell you you can’t!”
There are so many places to start with this one: The former Lehman Bros ummm errrr **risk manager** supposedly at the risk-helm; that it occurred within the supposed sober-minded Swiss Bastion of Stability (remaining CHF Longs take note and please re-examine thesis!!); The sheer size of the loss (WTF kind of nominal exposures did it take to generate that magnitude of red-ink?!?!?); and that, while dwarfing other rogue trading losses, still seems trifling in comparison to Madoff, GreeceIrelandPortugalUSACalifornia, FNM&FRE, and, yes, UBS's own US sub-prime write-offs and subsequent equity raise; AIG/Cassano's ridiculuous carpet-bombing of the market with sub-prime "puts", and so forth. These of course will be examined in (hopefully amusing) detail by everyone else, the results I am currently enjoying.
Caitlin R. Kiernan – The Ape’s Wife
Brass Construction ~ International ~ Capitol ~ 1984
There would be no more Sorrow
In a large bowl, pile the bread flour, plain four and salt and make a well in the centre of pile. You can put the flour straight onto a large work surface if you like but I find I just end up making a mess so I always use a bowl. Pour the dissolved yeast mixture into the well and move your fingers in a circular motion to slowly incorporate the liquid into the dry ingredients until all of has been soaked up. Next, slowly pour in the other half of the tepid water into the flour and gradually incorporate it. You want the dough to be quite moist as the more moist it is, the lighter your bread will be.
country girl in charge of the blankets and her sister, a little fancier, supervising shower supplies.
Intensity of fun: moderate
1I said, I will take heed to my ways, that I sin not with my tongue: I will keep my mouth with a bridle, while the wicked is before me.
Woody Harrelson, The Messenger
Regarding character traits, Maimonides writes “that a person should follow the golden ‘path of the middle’ and not lean towards one extreme or the other.”
Actually, I did do a good bit of reading, it was just kind of different than what I usually do. My son's online course is an English course called, "The Journey." The readings were a really interesting collection, everything from poetry by Robert Frost, Alfred Lord Tennyson, and Mary Oliver, to articles by Steven Covey, to a section of Helen Keller's Autobiography, and a section of KAFFIR BOY. There were also about ten short stories- "The Necklace" by Guy Mauipassaunt, “The Silver Mine” by Selma Lagerlof, How Much Land Does a Man Need? by Tolstoy, and "The Bet" by Chekhov.
However, the film does actually have some funny moments and moments that are actually somehow touching. It’s great to see the image that George Banks has of his kid as she was once all young and little, going from braces to push-up bras, and little scooters to a Cadillac, and now she’s finally going to live on her own and be a grown-up just like him. This was brought up a lot, almost too much at some points but I think that this film shows a touching look on what the relationship between a father and daughter is and how it’s a happy but also kind of sad moment to see someone who seemed so little, be a biggy kid now.
We count years, months, days, and hours. Everything “counts” as we manage this neurological monster that lives in our back pockets.
Having said that, I’ve never used or been exposed to virtual reference from an archivist via Chat formats. Interestingly enough, our outreach librarian handles ALL reference requests, at times, consulting the archivists. While I see this as a gap between reference and technical services, I also think it encourages skill sharing between staff and opportunities to strengthen on-the-job duties. With outlets like chat for digital archives reference, it is important to offer alternatives for reference, but I also think archives reference deserves more time and thoughtful considerations. Electronic finding aids with digital object links are ideal, but I’m wondering how they work with large, legacy collections? Small collections have the advantage in that way. Financial support is always going to be a barrier in service, so how might we utilize established library public reference services already in place?
But perhaps the best way to reveal the absurdity of much that has been suggested would be to take it seriously. Let us do that then. Let us describe the society and the nature of the media in the world that is contained in those public responses to the DA's decision.
BLITZER: Is there any dialogue under way right now between your
Today we drove around the area of the lower sloped of Haleakala called Up Country. Up Country consists of rolling hills, cattle farms, lavender gardens, and botanical gardens. I didn’t want to drive up all of the switch-backs to the top, so we visited the Kula botanical gardens (a family-run operation). We were there during peak flower blooming and we saw many exotic flowers and unique plants. There were also waterfall, a koi pond, and an aviary with lovebirds. These gardens were more beautiful garden than the arboretum on Oahu and we didn't get lost!
"I would actually drink..." Here Leone pauses and looks at Pinkerton apologetically, "I'm gonna say it - Miller Lite in the summertime."
My sweets, what are you doing this weekend? My mom is coming from Michigan to visit tomorrow, and Alex and I are taking a staycation in New York next week! Alex is staying home from work, and my mom will hang out with Toby while Alex and I go on adventures, like taking snowy bike rides, going to a speakeasy in Queens and having long dinners with friends. We're even considering staying in a hotel for a night (is that crazy?). I'm so excited for a breather and want to give my mom a huge kiss for letting us galavant around the city!
On NFL game days this season, Rock Bottom Brewery will offer a delicious dining deal. The new special appetizer menu offers a variety of appetizers priced at $5, $7 and $11. The menu is available on Sundays during any and all games.
Here is how I made the soup:
Pranab Mukherjee, in his Budget speech, said, “To ensure that the objectives of the National Food Security Bill are effectively realised, a Public Distribution System using the Aadhar platform is being created.” The Finance Minister also mentioned, “The recommendations of the task force headed by Nandan Nilekani on IT strategy for direct transfer of subsidy have been accepted.” Speaking to this newspaper, Anupam Saraf, a former Governance Advisor to the Government of Goa and an independent leadership, strategy and innovation mentor, said, “The process of registering individuals under Aadhar was assigned to third parties. There is no way to ensure that the third parties will not register non-existent individuals. This leaves a lot of room for massive scams, corruption and leakages if the data is used for distribution of subsidies. Thus the proposed Food Security Bill and targeting of fertilizer subsidies will be based on data which is not reliable. Instead of better targeting of subsidies, it will only lead to more leakages.”
* Close to my Heart Cranberry Ink
And almost every time—cut the last two lines.
When April gets to know you, she explains her unusual story. Every since she was little, April felt different from the other kids. When they squealed, she purred. When they played with dolls, she played with balls of yarn. April says she feels like a cat trapped in a woman's body. And she's felt that way ever since she was a kitten.
I'll leave you with a certain Spotted One trying to rescue his favorite blinky ball from the clutches of the Holee Roller which he received for Christmas. For some reason, he doesn't seem to get as much pleasure out of his new toy as we do. The entertainment factor for us is quite high. What can I say, we're easily amused these days......
Your book did not. You never saw:
Item #: CPTW-M1201-03
“How’d you kids like to make 50 cents?”
Artmaking. It was awful.
I’m sorry, but the ad was misleading. The position advertised for was a reporter. Oh yes, I’d definitely be the reporter-and editor-for one paper. Needless to say, I nearly had an ulcer as I sat through the interview.
He was a raisin of a man,
well, first 2 year milestones . . .
3) Do not be afraid of the teeny weeny lil' CDRs. They can fit on the spindle of your computer disc media player, no problem!
We're slowly getting the starting sounds of words out of his mouth. We still use sign for 95% of our communication, but we are really pushing for sounds. He's great at signing "bath" and saying "bah" while doing so. He can completely say "side" (outside), "star", "Dada", "sissy." We have another PAT evaluation at the end of this week, so we'll see what she says about his vocal improvements and see if she believes an intervention may be necessary.
This is a no brainer, even people who aren’t hardcore Prince fans own this soundtrack to the same-named movie. Starting out with the hard-rocking “Let’s Go Crazy”, the album offers a tasty mix of pop and soul. The album also contains one of his most covered songs, “When Doves Cry”.
The both follow the same flavor profile, malty stout with more of a cocoa nib flavor in the bitter department than coffee. It was perfectly carbonated just enough to make it drinkable, but not enough that it takes away from the heaviness of the beer. The regular version reminded me alot of Lagunitas Imperial stout, but the nitro was a whole different ball game. The oak aging was just enough to give the beer another level of depth, a slight tannin acidity kind of like a wine. But the oak just made the flavor that much more complex. The nitro tap definately helped add another layer, along with the gigantic head that a nitro tap produces it gave it a great creaminess that just pushed the beer over the top. If it was up to me I could have sat there at that restaurant table one the street in Portland all day drinking that beer. Actually in fact I did nurse that beer for quite some time since it was a perfect day and we were leaving the next day...
After some food, water, and rest we started the final chapter on this trip. By this time we started seeing dayhikers from the rim. It was possible, I suppose, to go down to Indian Garden and back in a day. Perhaps in warmer season spend the afternoon down and then come back in the evening. Well, that can be done some other time. We had the goal to make it out, preferably before dark. Since there were no junctions any more I let the guys to just go. Shafi, Rienk, Lily, and Joseph sprinted ahead. I sort of stayed behind to make sure that Rita was fine.
Do you have a wedding dress that you know will never be worn again? Is it a to beautiful to be kept in a box on the top shelf of your closet. Maybe you would enjoy it more if you could wear it in another way?
If you read the blog on 16th April, you'll have seen Sue Purkiss's review of All Fall Down, Sally's latest book. Now you can have the pleasure of seeing the story from the other side, how the author did the research that fed into the authenticity Sue found in the book. But first, a bit about Sally:
Wrapped up in a five-pound note.
Date: 13.3.2010
Yup, Johnny Cash covering (bugger…the ‘Hot August Night’ bloke from the seventies). You should listen to some of his covers. He did an effing amazing version of Nibe Inch Nails ‘Hurt’. Plus Depeche Modes ‘Personal Jesus’. ‘I Won’t Back Down’ (Tom Petty?), ‘I Hung My Head’ is absolutely a must hear. Who first did that one? Heartbreaking. Neil Youngs ‘Heart of Gold’and (who did) The Mercy Seat (Nick Cave?). Most of you know that I am *not* a country music fan, but Mr Cash’s take on these tracks have spun me.
“He’s got to stop criticising (federal Liberal president) Alan Stockdale and Malcolm Turnbull and (Melbourne Lord Mayor) Robert Doyle and (Senator) Michael Ronaldson and John Hewson and Andrew Peacock and (Mr Kroger’s former wife Senator) Helen Kroger.
We welcomed Luke Notary ’96 and his band House of Waters to perform at last Tuesday’s special assembly and to hold workshops with jazz and world music students. Based in Brooklyn, House of Waters is composed of Max ZT (hammered dulcimer), Moto Fukushima (6-string custom Fodera bass), and Luke (percussion).
I’d be a pretty lousy agent. I love some genres, and I don’t love other genres. I read outside my favorites, but I generally stick to Science Fiction and Fantasy (hence the title of this here blog). That means that right out of the gates, I’m already biased (I'm a scientist, this a big admission, here). There are stories I’d much rather read than others. That means a Yes from me might be a no from someone else. Dragons in space? From me, that’s a yes. From just about any self respecting agent? That depends (on concept and writing), but probably no. It’s as much about personal taste as it is about the craft. There were perfectly fine queries that were just for things I don’t like to read, so they got “no.”
04. Press It Onto Wax (Feat. The Aztext)
He needs to solve a case that has becomes a political hot potato, come to grips with his divorce, while he hopes to rescue LIZZY from a dead end life. But he begins to question who most needs to be rescued: LIZZY or himself.
Sometimes the truth just hurts. Sometimes there is no comfort in the truth. Sometimes it just is what it is, and the only comfort is just knowing that no matter what, God is working for His glory.
4. into the mixer, beat in one egg at a time, beating well after each egg. Don't forget to scrap down the sides between egg addition.
The noose is tightening on your organization, vast amounts of money printing are now required to keep your manipulated economy afloat. It will ultimately result in huge price inflation, or, if you stop printing, another massive economic crash will occur. There is no other way out.
1. Please post something YOU made. It doesn't matter if it is crochet, quilt, clothing, anything would be fine. I want to see it! If you use someone's idea or patterns please give them the rightful credit.
All that has been said about 'sight-seeing' and 'picture painting,' the little French talk, and observations to be noted in the family diary, belongs just as much to winter weather as to summer; and there is no end to the things to be seen and noted. Vol 1 pg 85-86
Your answers should be in respect of the work you are undertaking for Sheffield Hallam University
Although Dan Clowes writes and draws all his own stories, the real art of this piece is how the hell this middle-aged man managed to nail the thoughts and characterisations of these two teenagers so well! The dialogue is spot-on, and the relationship between the girls and their ‘friends’ is agonisingly real. Everyone goes through that awkward 'no longer a kid, not yet an adult' phase, and I guess that's why this book is so easy to relate to. It's one of those stories where, on the face of it, little happens, yet dig a little deeper and it's pretty much the whole of life, wrapped up in eighty odd pages.
Till we caught our breath from the womb of death
COURT CONVENES
Unfortunately, due to political reasons, I was not permitted to publish this finding (just used it as my master's thesis).
Dilip Kumar burgles his way into the performance of every Indian actor of substance whether the actor likes it or not.
Summer is fast approaching and I know that means I will probably see you less. If this year is anything like the last, that is what will happen. I wish it would mean I could see you more, and that maybe I could go to the lake with you on occasion, but you’re still wanting free time and I understand. I will fill my time doing my own thing, but missing you all the while.
Ahh...I miss my sister.
“The Basel game will always be remembered for the carelessness of our performance.”
Honestly, eBay is so last decade!
Good Evening Lovely Readers and a very warm welcome to new followers Helen and Lily...
I have to say I’m very impressed with this kit, which, although a little pricey (at £20 for 5), includes an insane number of options and extra bits. Unfortunately it only includes two psycannons, however converting the psy-silencer with a ammo clip and heavy bolter was very easy.
I cheated on the shrub with a dandelion.
But more recently, the tide has been running the other way, with the separate restaurants being stripped out and in effect colonising the rest of the pub with their place settings, pretentious, pricey food and table reservations. It is more true than ever before that many pubs have, to all intents and purposes, turned themselves into restaurants and left behind their original purpose in life. Very often, there’s no attempt to provide even a small area that feels welcoming to casual drinkers.
Personally, I’m not a fan of blues, Eric Clapton or any of that kind of stuff. However; what’s so great about Alabama Shakes is how they breathe a whole ton of fresh air into this somewhat tired genre, that makes it seem far less overbearing and niche. Yet it’s not sugary pop (don’t expect Gotye). If anything it feels more soul inspired and the whole thing conjures up a world of sepia. That can’t be a bad thing.
Well the title to this post could relate to two things .. .. either my share for the day .. .. or myself !!
Focus On Next Twelve Months, and Then Perhaps on the Twenty Four Months After That
BEGIN ANYWHERE.
It seems that when Bonnie and I get together any simple project like a Tat Across Time piece, or a lesson plan, or a book pattern........it gets complicated. The good thing is that we laugh and have a good time far more than we tat and stress out over it!
I can't imagine why either of the first two beers were served, better no beer at all than bad beer.
storm the castle, and execute the entire royal family except the princess. Rescued by the knight who slew her chayim, Jeniah is now heir to the throne of Arden and the only hope for freeing her people from tyranny.
a customer says she bought the iPad 3... After coming home from Walmart with her purchase, she says she was stunned to find "a stack of papers. I was very upset to see that it was not in there." She says the pads were added to provide weight but that there was no iPad in the box. She returned to Walmart and was turned down by a manager.
We spend a lot of time waiting and I'm guessing most of us think that waiting is a waste of time, but is it? Could it be that waiting is part of God's design for our lives to slow us down enough to see what's important around us. Last week, God himself knows that I really didn't have time to spend six hours in a waiting room while my "to do" list grew and grew...and yet, here I am and the world's still spinning! In that waiting time, I spent time talking with my brother, sister and sister-in-law - we dont get to do that much anymore. I spent time talking to a stranger whose son was in the hospital and was also waiting...turns out he's a Christian brother from Quincy. I spent time looking out a window and thinking about how blessed I am...worshipping God by staring. I spent time praying..thankful for my mom and asking for God to protect her. I waited and life slowed down and not much mattered except the waiting of it all and somehow that was what God wanted me to do.
Building a business
Of the many memes being parroted by writers, one of the most destructive is "Most self-pubbed ebooks don't sell."
Sidepod Version 2.1
Jacqueline Fernandez is a Sri Lankan actress and model who works in Bollywood films. She is a former beauty queen who won the Miss Sri Lanka Universe in 2006. She has received an International Indian Film Academy Award and Stardust Award for Best Female Debut in 2010,for her role in the Indian film Aladin.
hisMrs
Walking through busy Chinatown, it hit me how little we see of the city these days. We get in our cars, zoom along our many expressways, from one suburb to another, bypassing the traffic but also the colour and life of the older parts of town.
He knows more than you,
So I decided to scrap the challenge at "scrap the girls".
They didn’t tell the network.
This includes regular meetings during the year (POAs); exceptional meetings (launch); and face-to-face training events (including initial sales training).
Steve was the first to speak introducing himself as a candidate and putting forward the need for a socialist alternative to the main parties. He was followed by Nial Vivian, one of those who took part in last years Jarrow March for Jobs 2011 who highlighted the sky-high levels of youth unemployment and the disasterous solutions being put forward by the government to deal with this including slave-labour workfare schemes.
With whom do you want to be doing it?
929 *D-II/16/1986. Interview of George Anastaplo. Studs Terkel Program, WFMT-Radio, Chicago, Illinois. (Incorporated in Item C-1992(1), above, pp. 520-36.)
I keep reminding myself to just breath, but even thats not easy...I just hurt...its just all to much for this heart broken girl
why me? you begin to shout
I love these people.
I’m not a scientist. I struggled mightily with science in college. It seemed like so much algebra and expensive names and tiny germy things I didn’t understand. But when I first heard science explained in easy words, I became keen on it, as keen as Commander Keen was on eating digital chocolate bars. (If you are not from the 80’s, and that made no sense to you, do not feel bad. You are normal. If you are from the 80’s, I’m so sorry. I understand. Me too.)
Jonathan learns what he's missed out on in life, what other people think and the true nature of the universe which is nothing like he would have expected it to be. At the end, having learned far more than he ever wanted to know, he finds out that it's usually never too late to start again. Only sometimes it is: no Ebenezer Scrooge or George Bailey-esque turnaround for poor Jonathan.
The book in back of it is an oversized one,
The mission of the Colorado Water Conservation in 1937 is clear, as stated in the authorizing legislation House Bill 6 1937 Section 1: “for the purpose of aiding in the protection and development of the waters of the state for the benefit of the present and future inhabitants of the state, there is hereby created a Colorado Water Conservation Board with powers and duties herein set out. Said board is hereby declared to be an agency of the state and the functions it is to perform as here in set out are hereby declared to be governmental functions for the welfare and benefit of the state and its inhabitants.“
This dish is easy to make, although it involves a bit of time in the prep work. It takes advantage of some of winter’s seasonal root vegetables : yukon gold potatoes, yams, parsnips and carrots. These vegetables are nutrient-dense, and very generous sources of fiber, especially when the skin is consumed. Root vegetables have enjoyed a bit of an upgrade in status in recent years, having previously considered to be peasants’ food and set aside for their more desirable relatives in the vegetable kingdom, the green leafies. But along with the movement to eat more seasonally, as well as an emphasis on nutritional value, these previously overlooked vegetables are enjoying a resurgence in popularity in many kitchens.
In the coming weeks, we’ll take a look at all the different mobility devices out there and help you navigate through the myriad options. In the meantime, if you have any questions leave a comment here, on our Facebook page or e-mail us directly at mobility@yurekpharmacy.com.
The title sounds uninteresting when you first see the book. I picked it up just to see what it was about. The word “Dharma” made me think that this is something about hindu philosophy or religion. But as I found out that this book was actually about Mahabharata, my curiosity and interest in it increased. As I checked the contents table, the chapter names really caught my interest.
"Nothing mobilizes capital like war."
On my confirmation day, lo these many years ago, I fully expected something to happen. I’d gone to classes faithfully, I’d read, I’d thought, I’d prayed. I figured I deserved something. A dove descending. Some kind of bright light. A voice from Heaven. An inner holy knowing. Some kind of change, at least.
Again, I am not sure if you have noticed or not, but I am not the most coordinated person on the planet, or even the universe, for that matter. And the C2K plan involves interval jogging and walking, which necessitates a change in speed on the treadmill.
“The dangerous 530-mile long passage over the Himalayan Mountains took its toll. Official records from Search and Rescue were closed in 1945. Final records showed 509 crashed aircraft records had been “closed”. 81 lost aircraft records were still open. 328 of the “lost” flights were ATC planes. 1,314 crew members were know to be dead. 345 were still listed as missing. “In addition, China National Aviation Corporation (CNAC) lost 38 planes and 88 airmen. “
I've arrived at the decision to forget the novel for now. I have ideas - many - and they are all safely stored in notepads and on my memory stick. They will keep and will, I hope, mature like a fine wine or a rich fruit cake.
rainfall on skin, there, far; my mouth
The lunch had carried on far longer than any meal we normally eat and it was time to depart. Gustavo and Ruth left us at the first corner, as they only lived a block away. Likewise Roger and Mirta could walk to their hotel, although it was the other side of 5 de Julio, so they left us as we disappeared underground again. I must find out what moles are called in Spanish.
When you consume a diet rich in fruits, vegetables and whole grains, you’re less likely to overeat since you’re getting fiber, vitamins, minerals and other nutrients that leave you satisfied. When we consume processed food in mass quantities, they promote overeating and leave you with little benefit. So be mindful of not only what you eat…but how much of it you’re eating, since a 100 calorie pack is not 100 calories if you eat all 6 packs in the box!
When I asked the question last week 'what is it about Paris' I felt as if I could have written on and on... there are so many aspects... from the mainstream to the offbeat... from the large to the small... Paris brings out the dreamers in us all, sparks our imaginations and sends the romantics amongst us into a frenzy...
“We are a major financial and legal centre so there’s a lot of expertise, and there’s also a lot of assets that go through the British financial institution, so it’s easier to disguise your assets,” Plamer told CNN.
What are your routines like?
So I finally received it.... My long awaited Le Creuset Stoneware, shortly after Christmas I was given the opportunity from CSN Stores to review a product of my choice. This was such a hard decision as Christmas had just past but I have to say I have always loved Cooking and Le Creuset Stoneware is amazing. If you haven't ever cooked with Stoneware you have no idea what you are missing. The even baking style and the nonstick surface makes anything that you bake come out completely amazing. I had a $75 credit to use as I saw fit as much as I would have loved the complete kitchen set I decided on adding some new stoneware to my collection of Red cookware.
Bishop Alan Hopes, Auxiliary Bishop of Westminster said “The fact the Chapel House was founded as a house of prayer and healing, and is now home to an abortion provider is a tragic betrayal of the life and mission of Dorothy Kerin.”
Looks like they sort of tried to erase the apostrophe on “tea’s” but probably left it because they weren’t sure.
Place on the baking tray to rise for about an hour, or until doubled in size, under a clean tea towel or a cling film. Once risen glaze gently with a beaten egg with a pastry brush, sprinkle with flaked almond and sugar. Bake in 225 degrees Celsius for about 15 mins or until nice golden brown colour.
Professor Rashib: Learn to copy each letter and do it quickly.
Silver Lining
-12 cup mini-donut pan
Regardless of the decision, one thing is certain: The issue is far from over.
Ollie’s mother and Rory looked at each other, drew a blank, and looked back at the Doctor, who had begun gesticulating and crowing as though he had just won X Factor.
She loved it!
Those of us with celiac disease must become vigilant, reading every label like a true detective. Kitchens must be scoured for sticky gluten residue lingering on cutting boards and non-stick cookware. Toasters full of crumbs and old wooden spoons can become a source of gluten contamination. Sharing butter with greasy crumbs from your teenager’s toasted bagel is suddenly scary (there are two jars of Vegenaise in our refrigerator now- one has Mom’s GF written in marker across the lid). When my sons still lived with us, and we sported a mixed kitchen, they had their own designated gluten cupboard for their favorite breakfast cereals, snacks and sandwich bread. The rest of the pantry was labeled The Gluten-Free Zone.
Exactly what needed to be said.
Andee Bell has found exactly what she wanted: fame, fortune, and respect. There’s also a special man in her life—Jenna’s brother. Despite her success, a secret quells Andee’s contentment. As memories torment, will she find peace in a relationship with God, or will she sabotage herself while also taking down the only person she cares about? As Andee finds her life, will she lose it?
The different legal views coming from the New World and the Old (the European Union, among other countries) do not help to tone down this apparent conflict. The trade mark approach, based on the “prior rights” principle is sometimes in conflict with the approach based on the protection of geographical indications (as in Europe), which is founded to some extent on the legitimacy of territorial rights, as a sort of preferential or privileged right to a certain geographical designation that confers on geographical indications a protection that is asymmetric and stronger than that conferred on trade marks.
11. A Pocketful of Stones
Hey Negrita is a great little band out of the UK that has THREE SXSW showcases. I'm not sure I've ever seen that. They're a great little band that is good to check out if you like your country a little rollicking with some great song writing.
A child who can’t follow rules is a child who’s always in trouble. This book starts with simple reasons why we have rules: to help us stay safe, learn, be fair, and get along. Then it presents just four basic rules: “Listen,” “Best Work,” “Hands and Body to Myself,” and “Please and Thank You.” The focus throughout is on the positive sense of pride that comes with learning to follow rules. Includes questions and activities adults can use to reinforce the ideas and skills being taught.
This 'How To Get Happy' project seems to be working so far. I'm finding the stresses of work easier to handle and I'm a much nicer person at home. And it's got my creative juices going regarding projects as well. Mission well underway!
The foreigners in the strongholds that Bacchides had built took flight; all of them left their places and returned to their own lands.
Still going to write. Now that I don’t have him in my ear clouding my thoughts, I think I’ll be able to express myself more on this journey. And still going to TRY to walk down memory lane, but a lot of it I feel are now lies and I don’t really know if I want to re-tell it. Our story that I thought was just one with a very sad ending is actually a sack of lies…all of it… and I don’t know if I’m capable of revisiting that right now. Then again, if the point of this whole project is to learn from it and to help others not make the same mistakes or recognize their own situations, then I guess I do have to do it. Just not now. So bear with me while I come to grips with it all.
Eating Animals
He finds that her adolescence in ballet school, with all its ebullience, is easy enough to write. Stenner decides to skip the period of stardom as a ballerina in her twenties, and to swing all his energy in the Yvonne's rough years of transition from being a very physical ballerina to being a remarkably cerebral and creative choreographer. Yvonne was very successful in this passage, a rare feat, and Stenner's ultimate ambition is to capture the wonder of this journey of self-discovery, of her inspiration, of her mental process, all on the background of her complicated liaisons.
A Box -
- Conclusion;
“Come on up, sugar,” the bus driver wheezed from way too many packets of cigarettes.
Don’t forget to take something.
I am not sure what the right course of action is. Do I ignore it hoping that she tires herself out, do I play her game and give it back to her over and over again, or do I let her know that this is not okay?
Taib’s daughter-in-law is seeking RM300 million for the assets the couple accumulated in their 19-year marriage and a further RM100 million in compensation. She has cited irreconcilable differences and her husband’s failure to have sex with her since 2001 as reasons for the divorce.
And then it hit me: I cannot handle being the girl who wussed out of skydiving for the rest of this family vacation. Scratch that: for the rest of my life. As I was rinsing the conditioner out of my hair (remember, I was in the shower), I imagined my future if I didn’t go skydiving.
Anyway, a couple of weeks ago a group of us went to The Abyssinian for my friend's birthday. I have never eaten Ethiopian food before, but have been keen to go here for ages so was pretty happy when told we were going there.
So today I was researching for my next trip (Europe for 3 weeks! France, Spain, Germany and Switzerland this time ’round) and I thought I’d post some of my favourite foodie pictures from last trip.
1/2 cup napa cabbage
Yes, there are beggars in Sweden. And a lot of addicts, drunks, and other belligerents. What, did you think "social democracy" would make people into better people??
Reykjavik, Iceland. I know, you're asking, "Why in the world would you want to go to Reykjavik, Iceland, Kay?" I'm not sure exactly, but I can trace my desire to see Iceland back to October of 1986. That's the date of the Reagan/Gorbachev summit that eventually led to the end of the Cold War.
As usual I have painted with my Distress reinkers.
After establishing your breath, begin to exaggerate the movement of the belly and pelvic floor. On your inhale, relax everything and let the belly rise. On your exhale, pull your belly toward your spine without moving your actual spine - keep your pelvis neutral. Now you are engaging the transverse abdominus and Uddiyana Bandha. Inhale and soften again. Take a few rounds of this breath. Inhaling and relaxing, exhaling and engaging.
So there you have it. My take on 2012. Do you like to make resolutions? What are some of yours this year? I hope you all had a great New Year's Eve and celebrated exactly how you wanted to!
(nominally the Magna Carta 2.0 but probably the UNHCR Beta . . . ) Tuesday, 07 February 2012 Super Admin NO HOLDS BARRED Raja Petra Kamarudin
Last minute shopping
When I chomp on queries here, I can't point out every single mistake on the first bite or it would be overwhelming for both the writer and the Shark.
Established by former President Theodore Roosevelt in 1908, the Chase Lake National Wildlife Refuge is located in Woodworth, North Dakota. With 4,385 acres of grass-covered prairies and extensive preservation efforts in past decades, the pharmacist jobs north dakota be awarded prizes for the pharmacist jobs north dakota a decent living, so many others.
56) The Spouse Sparrow had a dog that had my mom's name, and I had a dog with his mom's name.
I give you this
If you want to keep up with our progress and want movie-star good looks, then join the beautiful people by clicking the 'follow' button above. Already have movie-star good looks? Well, then I'll look better by association so win-win.
To be destructive
Josh: Eewww!
For Tristan Hart, everything changes with one crashing wave.
My question to all of my readers are, are you for this amendment or against it and why? I don't normally get into political battles in my blog but I feel strong about this one and thought I would share my opinion.
1. A method of swinging on a swing, the method comprising the steps of:
This is obviously a lie in the case of garlic and many other natural plant drugs. Any doctor that claims that natural substances have no effect on human physiology need look no further than garlic, opium, aspirin (derived from spiraea ulmaria), caffeine, codeine (Papaver somniferous), quinine (Cinchona ledgeriana), THC etc. In fact a very quick Google search points to over 300 important drugs from natural sources.
I enter this realm again with the intention of love.
+You will be published each month in our online magazine
So a wooden dowel, painted black, was placed into an old umbrella stand, also painted black.
need to be prepared for everything. Even if your child
I am very conscious of what I eat now that I am older, and I accredit that largely to my mom. She made me realize that there's a pretty direct (seemingly obvious) correlation between what you eat and how you feel. With fruit, she got me hooked with some of the most irresistible berries nature has to offer—raspberries. Not only did I enjoy their sweet and sometimes subtle tartness, I enjoyed eating them the way Amelie did. My boyfriend and I love putting them on our cereal, eating them by the handful, and lately, on top of tarts and in pies.
Christopher Nolan's "Inception" is currently the internet film community's Rage du Jour. Continuing a battle over the merits of Nolan as a filmmaker that began two years ago with "The Dark Knight", this was also one of the few films being released in yet another barren summer movie season that was worth seeing and talking about. Anyone who knows me is probably aware now that I consider The Battle Over Nolan a low point in film discourse on the web, where both sides of the "debate" have descended into hyperbolic nonsense as if there was a victory to be won on the matter. His films are often wildly misrepresented to simply fulfill a narrative each side wants to create about his abilities as well as those who disagree with their opinions. Either Nolan is the filmmaking genius who is the heir apparent to Stanley Kubrick or he is a complete hack responsible for the downfall of motion pictures.
1 Tbs sugar (I used splenda)
I highly recommend this terrific book to those suspense/thriller lovers out there looking for awesome books to read. And as in all of Randy’s books, you will see Jesus and salvation through Him throughout the book.
At the age of 17, although having been too young to serve in World War II, he became the youngest member of the 43 Group, a Jewish veterans’ underground organisation. It broke up what it considered Fascist meetings in East London. The Telegraph refers to him as an “anti-fascist warrior-hairdresser” whose aim was to prevent Sir Oswald Mosley’s movement from spreading “messages of hatred” in the period following the Second World War.
Ad infinitum. She would do this for hours if we let her.
Ca-tur (Water)
WHY I don't make a good Mormon despite my strong convictions in my
Metabolism is basically how you process what goes in to your body. A ‘fast metabolism’ is very good at using and reallocating the good things in the food that you eat. A ‘slow metabolism’ is less efficient and often a lot of possibly good stuff goes to waste because it is not used.
I finished off this look with the Rimmel Marshmallow Lips in Coral Orange. Love this colour!!Now on to the day-outing..we met up with my sister's friend who happened to be in HK at the same time. He suggested have tea at the Peninsula Hotel, which was just the perfect idea because I have been dying to have afternoon tea for a while now!! The queue was as expected, long! It took us about 85 minutes to be seated. Both me and sister went for the afternoon tea set and the friend went for a scone set.
I Wait.
'the rumpoles & the barleys' by karen hunt
The tension and stakes increase as the hero nears the ‘inmost cave’ where he will battle the ‘monster’ for the prize. Think of Theseus, who travels from Corinth to Athens, vanquishing baddies, beasts and tricksters along the way. This is not the big battle but it prepares our hero for the big battle.
Second, because a few years passed between the event and the making of United 93, the filmmakers were able to reference the 9/11 Commission Report as well as other reporting on the event to recreate the details as fully as possible. This film also incorporates news footage from that day.
Look- I believe in eternal heaven and hell as much as the next Buddhist, which is to say not at all, so the only horse I have in the race is of the Stop Making My Family's Happy Celebration Your Personal Time to Sermonize and Admonish variety. Dude.
Cheddar
“Yes, but mind the dates: she died a full two years before he did: April 1918. There’s something of a salacious story that came down to me regarding that.”
“And I love you too!” He said, “But, this is wrong…between us…you know…?”
When they entered the studio to introduced themselves, I whispered to Jessica, “I know that guy with the headband. I saw him in the hotel lobby this morning.” As his partner walked by on his way to the podium, he looked up into our booth and gave both Jessica and I a thumbs down. The audience went, “Oooooooooo”. Jessica said, “That wasn’t very nice”. I just rolled my eyes and stuck my tongue out at the the guy. The audience laughed.
Even wrestler Terry Funk - who was one of the absolute highlights of Paradise Alley as far as I'm concerned - is about as muted as Loggia, if not moreso. In Alley, playing the dumb brutish pug Frankie The Thumper with a heavy verbal dosage of Damon Runyon's colorful thugs, every one of Funk's scenes was a highlight and well worth watching for the delight Funk seemed to take in playing such a great part. Here, as bodyguard Ruker, all he does is wear a suit and get punched by Sly in a scene. Nothing else. Maybe there was a sense of being upstaged feared by someone? Gotta wonder....
Her little brother, on the other hand, is rapidly growing up to have - how can I put it? A problem with authority.
Rory was just in to purchase a can of beer to stuff his chicken with... Nothing illegal - he assures me the chicken is dead. We both tasted it and both liked it. (Back me up Rory!!!)
After all, I have so much to share now that my life is pretty much non-stop design-making, traveling and filled with exciting nights out.
This Halloween, don’t dress up as someone (or something) else—be yourself! In fact, why not have a few of your friends dress up as you too? Japanese company REAL-f managed to design the most super realistic 3D face replica that you have ever seen.
Death, sickness, stupidity, bad decisions, the movie Brazil, the book 1984.
His fingers are still caressing the insides of my thighs, above my knees and slowly but steadily heading higher. God, is this total stranger going to start stroking my pussy right here in the middle of the subway? The idea is incredibly arousing but I'm not sure I can do it. I might have to stop this, stop you. It occurs to me that my knees are shaking, from excitement or nervousness, I'm not sure which. Your mouth is on my earlobe now, sucking insistently, and you're flicking my nipple repeatedly, setting up a rhythm that under normal circumstances would propel me straight back toward coming. But I'm jittery. Like an unswaddled newborn afraid of flying apart, I need to be contained, calmed. I realize I've grabbed your wrist, as if I might stop you. You sense my hesitation and murmur in my ear, "Hands behind your head."
Want more reasons
I came back with lessons learned. I came back with my priorities in order. I came back with a renewed spirit and a connectedness to my "old self."
Embellishments - Adhesive stones,ribbon from Hobbycraft
Wooden coffee tables, specifically the convertible coffee tables, are loved by children as a place to play their games or do their homework. Their ability to have their height adjusted makes them perfect for children of all ages. Your children will enjoy their wood coffee tables so much; they'll want to keep them in their bedrooms. Because the price of wood coffee tables is so affordable, you can get a couple so you don't have to move them from room to room.
I had a pint of Crouch Vale Yakima, a bit underwhelming, and scrutinised the fridges, which were packed with a good range of Kernel bottles, and some Oakham and Brodie's offerings. I'm intrigued with the way Brodie's bottled beers turn out. I've had a few now, and they've all been excellent in a way that makes their draught counterparts seem like different beers. The London Porter is good on cask but sensational in the bottle, for instance. The Fountain had Seven Hop IPA - the colour seemed much darker than on draught, and some of the huge hopping had given way, leaving a big balanced beer with a lovely mouthfeel and nice drying finish. I wrestled with stopping for more, or making one last pitstop.
I love browns with this look.
The Abstainer’s Handbook (second edition), p.54
Reluctant as I am to rush to judgement as to how the facts will eventually pan out in respect of the recent terrorist killings in France, if the current suspect Mohammed Merah, a 23 year old of Algerian origin, with a lengthy criminal record and numerous Pakistan stamps in his passport, (referred to here in typical BBC speak as a "Frenchman") does turn out to be the killer, we will have seen yet another example of the, now entirely corrupt, Western media rushing to their own judgments and composing a narrative based on their own wishes, rather than upon any rational analysis of the facts.
8. Aham Brahmasmi, Ayam Atma Brahma, all these beautiful exhortations are not manmade. Man may participate into that existing value and be honored with that.
"Not only did the racially charged statement offend Plaintiff (Jackson-Burch), the manner in which it was stated reveals a level of comfort and bigotry that is usually reserved for private embrace," the lawsuit states.
Perfect for those quick errands this is a 4 pocket card wallet that will hold your license, your atm card, a credit card, and a little bit of cash! Awesome if you don't want to carry a big bulky purse or you live in an area with a high mugging rate (this is directed at my sister). Not to mention its got that cute little bird on the branch on it and the stitching makes it adorable! I want it!
May 30 Wednesday 10:30am-3:30pm
My parents told me this when I was very young because I asked a lot of questions about why angry or jealous people act in a certain way or lose control. Their answer changed my life. Ever since, I developed a sense of self perspective of my emotions and my behavior around people. I’ve always made a point that if I’m angry instead of lashing out at someone, I shall use that energy to clean. To clean my table, my storage of my computer, the kitchen, vacuum the floor, fold clothes etc. etc.
It was never my intention to write a personal blog, and I can’t continue to do it. One of my writing teachers in her advice to our non-fiction class wrote “If you’re not standing on the edge, you’re taking up too much room.”
This lock lift you up onto the one and a half mile tidal section of the Ouse where the New Bedford River joins this section, connecting it to below Denver Sluice.
See I don’t believe in coincidence. I don’t believe in happenstance. I believe God made good people, people who care, people who see a starving girl and give her what they can. These are the people who will be seated at the right and left hand of God because they don’t care. They do not do the work that they do for the acolades but simply because they can and know that it is right.
long-hair, small waist, bare feet.
Women in this male-dominated world are all secretaries, whom the males are reminded, should are not be treated like toys—but nonetheless are. In today's world, it is clear that the efficient and trustworthy Miss Jones, the smart Smitty, and the quick-plotting Rosemary would be at the head of the World Wide Wicket Company instead of out bowling or wickedly spinning webs to find husbands. But in 1961...well, those gender lines were at the musical's satirical heart. Today the plot appears somewhat as a stale joke with little resonance.
Comes a low, clear, trickling sound;
But I have made a mental note that next fancy dress day she can go as a princess
Hello Everyone!! Today I'm talking about my FAV technique - FEATHERING!!! It is often said that this is the hardest technique, but I love it and when you practice a few simple things, you will love it too!!! :) This technique is primarily used when you want to colour something from two DIFFERENT colour families, such as dresses, fairy wings and flowers (think pansies or irises that change from purple to yellow). The biggest thing to keep in mind is that, when using this technique that you use colours that end in the number 0, 1 or 2! Why? Because they are very pale and will blend from one to the other. Darker colours are difficult to achieve this look, although with some practice you could also use colours that end in a 3.
Mkhabez (Pecan Cookies)
‘lets frack leitrim’ ‘Trickster ill fame.’
They never hurt a hair of Him, they only let Him die;
5 – Cabin in the Woods – £561.905 – £4.632.981
Life is still good here on the Livingston front. Max is officially three which is still crazy to think about. His labs are still good and he continues to do very well both developmentally and in growth. He has gained a little bit of an attitude since his third birthday which means that his new favorite word is "NO!" Mommy and daddy are NOT very excited about it. He spends a little more time in time out these days as well. He is testing his boundaries more and more each day and mommy seems to be loosing her patience with it a little more than daddy is, but that's a three year old for you.
3 Heathen Earth 6:04
3- *all-star tag-team challenge champions*
*C/stock - Stampin' Up! Bashful blue
Plants…not flowers
To make the glaze, mix together the cream cheese and orange juice concentrate. Whisk in the sugar. Drizzle over cooled cake.
I went off to the store and bought Sense and Sensibility (1995). I fell in love with the whole cast of the movie. Emma Thompson played Elinor Dashwood. She was a perfect Elinor because of the way she looks mature and wise which was the type of woman that Elinor was. Kate Winslet played Marianne Dashwood. Winslet was a young and passionate actress which fit so perfectly with Marianne. Colonel Brandon was played by Alan Rickman. Does the name seem familiar? Colonel Brandon was played by Snape! It was a little hard to get used to that because I always saw Rickman as Snape and to see him play a handsome bachelor blew my mind away. He did a good job because I felt like I was watching a different person. And Hugh Grant. yes…..Hugh Grant played Edward Ferrars. I always thought that Grant played the “player” kind character, but Edward Ferrars required someone who can act shy and loyal. Hugh Grant did just that. It was hilarious for me to see Hugh Grant show off a shy character.
It's OK that I'm probably not going to live up to that last thing I just said.
And she says when can I see it?
Looking for more creative uses?
There is a common element that has driven much of the progress in each division—our members. ABC Canada could not have expanded and evolved as much as it has without you, and we thank you for your continued support. We are proud to report that from 2009 to 2011, Canadian membership has grown 11 percent. We remain committed to working with members, defining their needs and providing solutions.
SATURDAY April 21ST,
Our global reach: Springboarding from our orphan nutrition work in Kazakhstan, and as part of our “A Child’s Best Start” partnership with Joint Council, SPOON staff members recently returned from their first trip to learn about child welfare institutions in China. Through initial observations and meetings, our team began to develop meaningful relationships and opportunities that will lead to improved nutrition for so many orphaned children in China.
Louvre Museum – Arguably the world’s most famous art museum, the Louvre’s most popular piece is Leonardo da Vinci’s “Mona Lisa.” It was established in 1793, and is one of the oldest museums in Europe. Its collections spans from the birth of great civilizations up to the 19th century. A whopping 5.7 million tourists visited the museum in 2002.
If you received one, sorry about that!
standing on the far left side of the beach in front of the store.
We had such a fun time celebrating our little girl! I was so sad that night thinking that she is one and how quickly it has gone. I just hope the next 17 years CRAWL by! :)
The New BS-8599-1 Compliant First Aid Kit meets customer demand, and more.
has no memory of.
Lastly...if all of this is sounding a bit strange to you,
It digs deep enough to turn the soil over, chop up roots
There were other surprises too, not directly related to such clockwork contrivances. In a standout performance, Wayne Robson, who plays the recurring character of Mike Hamar on Red Green, here plays another convict, Wayne “The Wren” Rennes, known for his many successful prison breaks. Here he exudes not that familiar endearing incompetence but a kind of weary professionalism, oddly reminiscent of Richard Farnsworth in Grey Fox. (Though Farnsworth is probably better known to the world as Matthew Cuthbert from Anne of Green Gables.)
Like I said, this is about a low level minor deal. But a kid Glen Sather went and traded yesterday was 19 years old, 6-foot 2", and 200 pounds; no Goliath by any stretch. But Ethan Werek, who played last season in Kingston of the Ontario Hockey League and scored 24 goals to go along with 28 assists for 52 points in 47 games was traded to Phoenix for another center; Oscar Lindberg, who is also 19 years old. However, this kid is only six-feet and 197 pounds. He only scored 5 goals with 9 assists for 14 points in 41 games last year in the Swedish Elite League. Werek was selected 47th overall in the 2009 draft. Lindberg was selected 57th overall in the 2010 draft.
- But I have to say as much as I don’t like our Olivia, the other Olivia is worse, because she is such a troublemaker.
Thank you for living through my shame,
“Serial ports are the cousins of parallel ports and would often be used for mice as well,” I told him. “Then came the invention of the PS/2 ports for mice and keyboards.”
I did read Jack London’s book while at school, but must admit my memory of it is pretty hazy after all these years. However, I know it is mainly focused on the animal story, told from the viewpoint of an unusual dog, Buck, who is taken to the Klondike gold fields but eventually leaves his owners to become the leader of a wolf pack. Wellman’s film adaptation does feature a dog – a beautiful and talented St Bernard – but the animal story is very much in second place to that of the human characters, with a romance between Clark Gable and Loretta Young dominating the drama. This means some Jack London fans are rather dismayed by this version, but, if you don’t worry about the book, I think the film stands up well on its own.
In each Friday Farm Fix post, I share a random sampling of what's been happening around the farm during the past week, and a lot of kitchen garden photos have been showing up alongside the cute baby animals, colorful scenery, and ever present farm dogs. I often been including a photo taken inside the greenhouse too. Right now it's a Swiss chard jungle in there.
Supported protocols: IMAP, POP, SMTP
Tues. Feb. 7th - House of Rock - Corpus Christi, TX - w/Bun B
If you have never been you must go and have a look!!
4. How would I store foods that need to be fresh likes eggs without power?
They seem to have an intuitive understanding of what's going to work and what's not going to work. They are not deluded by marketing cliches or expert opinions. They draw their conclusions from a kind of personal understanding rather than conventional wisdom. I've spent a lot of hours trying to pinpoint exactly what it is that makes them exceptional.
Wheeee!!!!
I met 'Loo Lady' at Shakespeare's Globe, during a break in the West Bank-based Ashtar Theatre's performance of Richard II, performed entirely in Palestinian Arabic.
Dear bloggers, tomorrow i will go in a beautiful place called Sunny Beach @Hotel Victoria Palace. (Bulgaria)
6. Place fabric over the white cup.
We haven't worked out all of the kinks yet. In fact, we haven't even discussed any of the kinks. We are barely past the "yeah, it might come to that" level.
–Living To Tell The Tale, p. 3, García Márquez’ autobiography, tr. by Edith Grossman.
By having the ability to graze this land, farmers and ranchers are able to more than double the land area for producing food.
It's covered in pimples.
Basic Grey "Pryus" - Bradford Paper
I finally got a full night's sleep. And I slept GREAT! That is the first night since my wife was in her wreck that I have gotten a WHOLE night's sleep. I feel sooo much better today!
Snake expert Long Shuai said: "It is truly shocking but we won't know the cause until we've conducted an autopsy."
Lots of them.
Day 172: Strawhouse
When asked by City Press whether the ANC’s support for Zanu-PF does not complicate that process, Mantashe insisted the two processes are separate.
@fountain_penmj: Glenn reveals his Kenyan birth certificate
(Laughter.)With regard to the jury instructions and standards of proof, Waxman had this interesting point:
It takes me a while to switch gears from one to the other at the end of a chapter. And, because it's taking about a month for each chapter (admittedly, these are long chapters), I tend to forget the hows and whys of one story line while working on the other.
Its pretty bad when my daughter and husband search the entire town for a new bath robe for me. They thought it was bad that there were countless holes in it and many bleached stains...
we norwegian call the "solveggen" - (the sun wall).
Apply daily, repeat as needed, watch things go to a whole new level.
Pours a hazy yellow with a white head that thins to a sheet fairly quickly. Has that deep yeasty smell that wits have. I'm hopeful though, because it doesn't have the plastic or chemical smell that many have. I've like the only other Wolaver's beer I've had so far, which was a very good stout, so maybe this will be better than most wits as well.
In France, before 2002, any money used to bribe foreign officials was tax deductible. When the former finance director of DCN made a claim for 31 million euro (RM124 million) allegedly used to bribe the Malaysians for the purchase of the Scorpenes, Breham said, the budget minister questioned such a large bribe, although he did eventually authorise the tax break.
-Sleepless nights, and napless days are exhausting
One guy who came out to sing and dance had some mic issues, so he actually told us to "watch him shake his bottom" as some sort of interim filler while he got the mic sorted. Whatthefuck?
I looked back at the girl wondering where I had seen her before.
A Game of Thrones
She would follow
I took apart this bed, The Dude drilled 4 new holes at desk height using a template I made, The Oldest and I cleaned under the bed, vacuumed and rearranged. I then put the bunks back together, and ran to buy the desk top. The Dude cut the wood to fit. It doesn't exactly, but at $36 a sheet, it's workable. The Oldest also did not want the side rails, so those were left off. He completely reorganized his room with the added storage, set up his fan and alarm clock, and set up his train set on a part of the table:
But unfortunately, there’s something implanted in my brain that stops me from such spontaneity and downright irresponsibility, stops me from picking up the crack whore on the corner, stops me from ingesting meth, stops me at beer 6, stops me from cheating on my wife, stops me from slapping the fuck out of people when they really deserve it, stops me from trying to fly from every bridge I cross and keeps me only smoking pot occasionally.
As far as the “fire the coach after the first loss” guy, everybody loses. No team is immune from losing. Every team, no matter how deep the tradition, has had bad streaks and mediocre seasons. Putting the coach on the hot seat from minute one is not going to make them prepare their team better. Would you do better at your job if your boss was hanging over you, constantly reminding you that you’re fired if you don’t perform perfectly, 100% of the time?
Mantel writes beautifully, for the most part. Her dialogue is natural, and she has a fine eye for description ("gentlemen . . . wearing their fallen-fruit silks of mulberry, gold and plum"). My one quibble is that she generally uses "he" in place of "Cromwell", so that it is often difficult to know to whom she is referring, particularly when she is narrating conversations among multiple speakers. However, once one gets used to this quirk, all is well.
For those still reading, I apologize. I needed to vent badly. and I don’t expect anyone to do anything or to even think anything about it. Writing is my therapy. Thank you for indulging me.
UniSource Energy Corporation, Alternative Energy, Deals By Year, 2006 to YTD 2012 4
Cause after rain theres always some sunshine! Right?
Servings: 8
GARROSH: Is she always like this?
4 Ba-benzélé 6:15
summer is approaching .. but you must take advantage of it before it actually starts especially here(dubai) I tell you, when you say summer, “to the max” it is. so we did. we went to fujairah with churchmates after attending church. it is a 2.5hrs drive. we reached the place at around minutes before 5pm and you wouldn’t imagine how the sun is still very bright that day/time. literal na sunny!
So, two hot-button topics that are sure to get a rise out of a wookie-suiter like me are torture and internal passport checks... er, I mean, "enhanced interrogation techniques" and "intermodal antiterrorist checkpoints". As Joel sums it up:
Lord, forgive me for thinking I am unworthy of a miracle. Thank You that You work
In January, I received an email from my principal announcing an opportunity to pursue a grant for summer travel and study aimed at invigorating, reshaping, or enhancing my teaching practice. I love to teach, and I love to travel, so I was immediately excited. After reviewing the materials provided by the granting agency, Fund for Teachers, I started thinking about what kind of trip might have the greatest impact for me and for my students.
I’ma be the hottest in this spot
Remove and set aside
Are cops passing the buck by arresting Carillo, covering for their own willingness to gun down black suspects, or is Carillo culpable? Prosecutors now have to convince a jury that if Carillo told the truth, McDade would still be alive.
Why? Fruit, vegetables, whole grains, and other organic items (meaning items that are not artificial, not in the “THIS IS ORGANIC” marketing way) have a lot of fiber – you’ve probably heard that word a million times in your life.
None of this had the remotest bearing on the imminent death of his master, whose fate was now faithfully fulfilling what he had so often predicted in his verses, for truly he was now being left as a bleached corpse in a vast and desolate moor of humanity. His own disciples were not lamenting the death of their master but rather their own loss at his passing. They were not bewailing the piteous demise of their guide in the wilderness but rather their own abandonment here in the twilight.
Hey, Senator Clinton, pass me the whiskey. I am so happy to know that they do not serve kool-aid under this bus.
Petronet LNG Ltd
This morning, we talked about finding 3 ways to be kind at school today- beyond the basics of what she already does and already enjoys.
It’s that time of the year again, my two girls are turning 4 and 2.
green apples for the horses and pink roses for racing!!!!
Vanilla: The addition of vanilla produces a smoother, creamier lemon flavor and it seems you can taste the milk more. If you like a tangy tart, lemony flavor forgo the vanilla.
When I came to live with Mom and Dad, we lived in the Cloud
Woman suffrage headquarters in Upper Euclid Avenue, Cleveland--A. (at extreme right) is Miss Belle Sherwin, President, National League of Women Voters; B. is Judge Florence E. Allen (holding the flag); C. is
As I've written once or twice before these past couple of weeks, the outpouring of support for my family after the fire nearly three weeks ago has been more wonderful and amazing than words can express. And that's why, as I was cleaning out my room today, I decided to pay it forward and spread the YA love around to my followers, too. The thing is, I've got more books and ARCs than I know what to do with, and not enough space to store them all--so I'm cleaning house. There's twelve books and twelve winners on the table here, so listen up.
I was expecting a big bold flavor to accompany the big bold color. And, well, it turns out the flavor of a dragon fruit is neither big nor bold. It’s good, but it’s very mild. It has a watery crunch, like a watermelon, with a kiwi-ish taste. It’s very juicy, and I didn’t notice the seeds at all. I would totally eat it again. I’d love to add it to a fruit salad.
4. Fuji apples, .50/lb. at Sun Harvest (through 11/17/10)
the church clock chimes 10
That was when it really started snowing. I switched my wipers on and stepped down a little harder on the gas.
This is in my eyes a very wise concept, and very early I decided for myself that it should be some guideline for my own life and that every now and then I will measure which stage I am on, and what is missing to proceed.
Layer 3: Cookie again, with a hole (or two!) to see the jam. And, as the French say cerise sur le gâteau, a paper-thin layer of royal icing.
I am so thankful for a boss who gets it. I think I can credit being able to work from home to the cerclage holding up so well (at least that's how I feel).
To which the Taliban genuinely replied:
The employee wi-fi connection is very weak when I am in the RV. It probably will work better when I am in the employee lounge area. My Sprint Mobile Hotspot is in roaming mode here. Sprint is usually unlimited, but not in "roaming", so I have to be careful when uploading pictures and stuff.
I hope you have a super DUPER Sunday!
Sitting in the backyard, the golden setting sun warm on my shoulder and my legs tucked up underneath me, I sip my cold, crisp white wine. My husband is mowing the lawn while my baby girl squeals as she chases the dog who's running for his dear life in fear of sticky fingers clutching his ears. Right now, right here life is good.
When I tried to buy a second position it didn’t let me, which seemed odd. Then I saw my margin, and realized that the difference between equity and margin must have been less than avialable margin requirements allowed. Only later did I start doing the math to realzie that the margin was really, really high. I think what happened is that Gold can now be purchased, but only at full price. So now, for every ounce of gold I buy, it’s tying up $1600-$1700 in margin.
Point being, the artist is tapping into what is unquestionably the default historical narrative of the modern American patriotic psyche. WWII is THE Good War, THE Just Cause of all just causes, used to justify all subsequent war-making, however obliquely - or not. The cultural centrality and ideological resilience of this narrative is perhaps best demonstrated by the remarkably diverse versions of it, especially comedic. From Ernst Lubitsch to Mel Brooks to Quentin Tarantino, with the lesser likes of Hogan's Heroes thrown in too, clearly; ironic ridicule is as effective as any other approach when it comes to having the Nazis symbolize Pure Evil.
Over the last year, despite not working at Motswari, I was fortunate enough to be able to do some free-lance guiding there, as well as just visit on holiday! Reading Grant’s blog updates made me rather envious of all the sightings that the guides and guests were seeing, and were probably a large factor in me visiting the area every 3 or 4 weeks. However, as Grant will attest to, it was almost as if the animals pre-empted my arrival and seemed to disappear when I arrived, stayed hidden for a few days, then came out the minute I left! It was almost uncanny the number of sightings the guys would have in the days following my departure. Naturally I got a bit of a complex about this, and it was not until I went through some of my photos and actually considered what I saw that I realised I had not been as unlucky as I had initially though!
The Dutch are the quiet ones of Europe. We don’t get much news of the Dutch as not much happens in Holland. I guess this is because they are all busy during the day unloading all the stuff that arrives in the massive port of Rotterdam and in the evening they are at home probably reading pornography, or going out to sex shows, smoking marijuana or relaxing with their feet up in wooden shoes, smoking a novelty handcrafted pipe. So I’ll move on to the people next door.
Time to open the Alamos Red Blend 2010.
Did you know that ZIP is an acronym for Zone Improvement Plan?
Maybe the MVP of this list, but it’s still the weirdest song ever to be used in an NFL commercial.
Our schedule reads trot sets, flat, jump, gallop, day off. Lather, rinse, repeat.
He faced Lynda, standing beside him, and her expression reflected his own amazement. “What was that?” she asked nervously.
Paul O’Neill – Producer/Composer/Lyricist
Out of all 54 pins most of them show beautiful white cabinets and marble counters. I have a deep obsession with white cabinets and marble counter tops. Although I'm not always faithful to the marble. Sometimes I think about wood counters or even stainless steal. But out of everything the white stays.
It's one of those little things that makes a birthday extra special in our house.
Pinball Playing Man: I mean, I’m not saying that you don’t know what you’re talking about, but I don’t know what you’re talking about.
Not been arrested, not gotten into a fight, thrown up or come into conflict with either the authorities or their fellow drinkers; but should that little inconvenient truth come out the taxpayers may wonder quite why Don is paid from their hard earned taxes...
DebK-Screamin’Peacock
I reached over with a shaking hand and picked up the first of what looked like a hundred burgers. I slowly unwrapped it and began to chew, tears running down my face.
Everytime I look for inspiration for new recipes and ideas on-line, I always come across gorgeous little blogs, full of lovely photos and descriptions. So, as I have oodles of photos of my very own creations, I thought I might try my hand at this too. Even if it's just me looking back over them!
Andrew’s birthday was on Easter Sunday (once we were back in town) so nothing was open except the pubs in London. We had a Sunday Roast at the Mayflower Pub, which was really nice. Andrew got to pour his own birthday pint behind the bar, which was a real treat.
-Layla with a series a kicks
Recently a friend of mine got her wish, she found her ‘bad boy’ (he thought he was bad anyway..) then was devastated a month later when she found out that he was an asshole! Uh… NO SHIT?!
After completing the list, I counted up my “Bad Boys” list, and there are 41. Forty one boys who have been important in my life in one way or another. Forty one boys who I have great memories with. Forty one boys who have either broken my heart, or I have broken theirs.
5. Danny Zella & His Zell Rocks - Wicked Ruby
Faith Petric and Mark Ross. From Rebel Voices: Songs of the Industrial Workers of the World.
Taking a stroll and eating good food
My heart is torn,
List of Figures
Some times the world works in mysterious ways. The universe sends a job, a boy, a new
"We just bought the former Rocky Run Tap and Grill in Columbia's Dobbin Shopping Center. We're going to open it as the Columbia Ale House. We expect to have fifty draft lines or so, three cask engines, dominated of course by Oliver Brewies products, just like the Pratt Street Ale House, and a good bottle selection. It's about 9,000 square feet, with a lot of outdoor patio space."
Don’t get me wrong! Money’s great and it’s provided for a great deal of my creature comforts, but I don’t really miss it. I barely exist, on paper, as I have not had a job the entire year of 2011, I never claimed unemployment, and I didn’t borrow more than $500 total, yet I’m still here, I didn’t shrink away to nothing (I actually weigh as much as I ever have), and I did quite a bit of drugs, without having to sell out, sell my body, or steal for it. I did steal $50 from one of my best friends, and lost him because of it, but that was for food. And, for that, I am sorry beyond belief.
Consciousness, Presence, All That Is, is not static; it is the infinite field of pure potentiality, the possibility of everything; spilling over, pouring itself out in pure Being, the beingness of everything in pure Love, the Love which everything is.
· 0.25oz Mint Syrup
That makes no sense.
The image is printed onto parchment paper, and colored with markers, then I added a coat of 'Fairy Dust' paint from Creative Inspirations to the tulip petals. The paint gives a gorgeous sheen to the flowers but it's nearly impossible to photograph. :-( I took my colors from A Gem of a Challenge, pink, blue, & green. The papers are all from My Mind's Eye. I distressed them even more by sanding them lightly. I love using stripes and polka dots together; why, I don't know! :-D I used dies to cut all the ovals, matting them together, and then matting everything with black CS. The black matting on the sentiment is done using two ovals the same size as the sentiment oval but spread out for that 'stretched' effect.
You cannot have a relationship with food. Use food for fuel not to sooth your feelings about love, men, and broken relationships.
This February only, take advantage of the opportunity to join my
SIZE: S (7’ long)
P—Pray about your writing and proofread your material carefully. Send your best material. Remember you are representing the King. Ask Him to help you write in a way that leaves eternal footprints in the souls of your readers.
The blue milk glass on the ledge holds all of our little odds and ends that seem to always pile up at the kitchen sink like water color brushes and baby medicine syringes. The basket to the left of the sink is for bottles.
Omer is a midfielder/forward who should give the SeaWolves another speedy player up front.
Conditions can make you sigh
I can place my order - big or small - and within just a few days my goodies will be delivered direct to my door. I particularly love the sentiments, the cardstock, and the inks.
However, no where in the Act does it say it can provide loans to individuals to acquire low-cost apartments using the property as a collateral. Despite the “guarantee” from DBKL, the loans are being made out directly to the property owners who may or may not have contributed to EPF.
This week's Friends of Speedy TV challenge at Mark's Finest Papers is to make a card celebrating spring, come join us, a different stamp set is given away to a winner every week!! http://www.mfpspeedytv.ning.com/
Snood Fever Continues!
"THE ACCOUNTANTS' REPORT.
I narrowed the choices—so, so many choices—down to three, and spent more time than is strictly sane on FontSpace, downloading and experimenting, apparently willing to spend the next fifteen years tinkering.
I am sick of not finding hope in my life. I see so many things going on in the world around me- and so many changes for others. But those things happen to other people, and I am left sitting in my partway packed up apartment waiting on phone call just for a second interview.
As a result of my research project, I have come to the conclusion that what consumers rely on mostly is their own freakin' experience. Can it be that the personal experience of enjoying a product is even more powerful than the triumphant voices of all the twittering "like-minded consumers, journalists, and objective reviewers?" Can it be that we're not all slaves to what others "like?"
When I am too wrapped up in a thought, an emotion, or a desire, I do this for about a minute, and it helps distance me from the thought or emotion. During my radiation treatment, I often repeat, “I have pain, but I am not my pain.” It is a simple yet effective way of lessening any experience of pain.
Movies From the Silent Classics of the Silver Screen to the Digital and 3-D Era
The Kuru dynasty was thinned like a fire-stricken bamboo forest, but its good seedlings were protected by Hari. The Controller’s mind became pleased by reestablishing Yudhisthira in to his rightful throne.
I know you have all been on the edge of your seats waiting to hear….Precious Youngest is employed! It was not easy let me tell you. The Saint and I took turns nagging her about applications and follow-up calls. There is just not a lot of hiring going on right now.
He turns around and quickly leaves. We all look puzzled. Seven of Nine/Annika returns to the room.
On where I have come from
42Every one of these towns had grass-lands round it.
Quite a run if you ask me. Fortunately the movie was a good deal shorter. I watched the film on the basis of a recommendation from a reader who suggested that if I liked Emily Blunt‘s work in The Devil Wears Prada and The Adjustment Bureau, then I should watch The Young Victoria.
Apparently this sculpture/barbecue smoker debuted in Memphis last year, but this is the first I’ve heard of it. Why a sculpture/barbecue smoker? I’m going to guess it had something to do with the Memphis In May barbecue festival, but my Memphis friends will have to confirm that.
Many times, exchange students or anyone else planning a trip to a new and different place goes through this kind of planning process and everyone tends to agree that it is important to prepare well before departure on such an experience. But we can sometimes over-prepare, especially when we are going to a very different place. In fact we over anticipated what we’d need to bring, and it was a burden. A good part of each activity involved searching through various boxes and bags and small corners of the car trying to find something we wanted to use, while much of what we brought wasn’t needed.
SUBJECT: Handmade basket ornament from Rwanda
She released five albums in different languages in 1987, and the following year returned to her classical conservatory roots with the double LP The Classical Nana (aka Nana Classique), which featured adaptations of classical songs and excerpts from opera. By the end of 1987, she had performed a series of concerts in Asia, including South Korea, Taiwan, Singapore, Hong Kong, Malaysia and Thailand.
In an email on Monday, Koh declined to comment on a pending case. Representatives for Apple and Samsung also declined to comment.
Hafnarfjördur is famous for having one of Iceland’s largest settlements of elves, dwarves and other mystical beings, which (translating from the Icelandic) are collectively called ‘Hidden Folk.’ Centuries-old folklore has it that whole clans of such beings reside in the rocks that make up part of the town’s centre. We do not doubt this at all.
Author Suzanne Collins writes the entire series from the point of view of Katniss Everdeen. While this typically works and makes for a relatively interesting story overall, when tied in with Collins limited writing chops, it severely handicaps character development in many of the secondary characters. Besides Katniss, Gale, and Peeta, all the other characters are developed only rudimentarily with little to no backstories. This took me emotionally out of some scenes as it was difficult to get invested and relate to such underdeveloped characters.
Your friend and neighbor from Noe Valley The Fair Oaks Community Coalition is heartened by the public's generous gifts and good wishes for the survivors. Donations are still being accepted, and will be disbursed to all 3 survivors. Contributions (cash or check) can be made here:
Today US dollar is = 1 AU dollar.
a photographer i am not.
Genious is Exhausting
They tend based their book on a fantasy relationship and or a mystical connection
There's a Jamaican man I knew who used to say "Don't fatten a fish for another man to eat", meaning don't wind your girl up and leave her wanting, she'll satisfy herself somewhere else. Or maybe it doesn't mean that, he also used to say "You know what time it 'tis" and I would smile, desperately hoping that I at least looked like I did indeed know what time it 'twas. Anyway, I feel like a fattened fish that grows cold on a plate.
She went right back to jerking and sucking
Greater Manchester Police is appealing to parents to ask their children to return home following incidents of disorder in Heywood tonight.
Ashlee Shelley
We all understand the need to sometimes bump off a main character. What would be the point of The Great Gatsby, Romeo and Juliet and Don Quixote if their protagonists had lived to ripe old ages? Don Quixote would have ended in the madhouse, Gatsby in jail and Montagues and Capulets would go on feuding in the streets of Verona, until Doomsday. Death in novels always has an objective, to teach the reader (as well as other characters in the book) a moral lesson. Whether is Anna Karenina jumping in front of a train, or Sydney Carton climbing to the guillotine, there is a moral behind their death: It is a far better thing to die than to go on sinning or leading a dull meaningless life.
So these were my online choices as I saw them – I can go with the overly romantic, walk a ton of beaches and drink lots of wine (two of which I adore) but what are we talking about while we’re walking, drinking and eating? Alternatively, I could join another (and his friends) in a flurry of his activities.
0420- Alarm. Reluctantly roll out of bed and pull on random clothes from the pile on the floor. Throw robe over everything. Slippers. Stumble downstairs, start car. Realize I forgot to put hubby's uniform in the dryer. Rush said uniform into dryer and pray. Put hubby's lunch in car, put trash on curb. Gulp down morning meds with OJ. Stumble upstairs, hand hubby slightly damp uniform. Feign ignorance about slightly damp uniform. Ignore husband's complaints about uniform. Subtly imply husband needs to stop being a pussy.
Leah is accused of a crime she didn't commit. Dumped by Adam, the man she planned to marry, she escapes to Aunt Jayne's smallholding in the Kent village of Winkleigh Marsh. Heartbroken and homeless, she strives to clear her name and deal with her emotions.
Children's Paperback
panic disorder
Well thought I would share with you the
All of this society 101 has sprung from several people over the last week telling us that they envy our lifestyle. Steve and I just turn to each other in wonderment whenever anyone would even think of wanting to do what we do every day. I guess it’s the grass is greener meets the photos that we post on the blog. No-one likes to portray the bad things about their lives and so we tend not to post anything depressing or sordid that might perhaps make someone think differently about us. My dad died on July 7th 2010 leaving us more aware of our mortality and suddenly able to call a few acres of land “mine”. “You lucky bastard!” (Said in Michael Palin’s voice from “The Life of Brian”…) and here it is if you are the poorer for never having discovered Monty Python so far… http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=8EI7p2p1QJI Yes…we ARE lucky and we will always be grateful to my dad for giving us something that we would never have had otherwise but right there is where the scene of happiness and joy starts to fade into reality and hard work. Nothing that is worth having is easy people! We tend to look to the future to deliver us from our lives today and some of us spend our lives waiting for “the kids to leave home”, “retirement”, “that winning lotto coupon” rather than taking stock of what life has actually dealt us and learning to not only accept and live with it but find real happiness in our own personal circumstances. How many of you have watched documentaries about native tribes out in the middle of the South American jungle who despite their lack of anything that we would be able to identify as “wealth” are all smiling, curious and most happy members of the human race with the strongest whitest teeth I have ever seen. I wonder how people living a subsistence life can be so very happy? Is it because they are living close to the earth that feeds clothes and sustains them and they have discovered their niche within this endless ancient balance of cycles. They are living how we all should live. Simply, with few needs and it’s only when you start introducing societies “wealth” that problems start to occur. I dare say I am glossing over the squabbles, the human vices and the general need that we humans have to stuff up whatever we are given that would be present wherever 2 or more people group together to coexist, but in general they would deal with it themselves and they would be very aware of the consequences of their actions. I find it laughable that we in 1st world societies have so much and are always hungry for more when these simple people are very content with their lot. Serendipity Farm is our chance to make a difference to our own little plot of earth and see if we can’t leave it better than when we arrived on it just under 2 years ago. The process of change that we are taking and where we found out how to go about changing for the better is what this blog is all about. I am trying to be as honest as I can about our lives but am as guilty of the next person in omitting some of the more nefarious things or glossing over them with humour. Life is tough enough without being constantly faced by negativity and so I try to temper reality with humour as often as I can.
♔ Details
So in the case at hand, in order to recognize that intelligent design is the best explanation of the appearance of design in the universe, one needn’t be able to explain the Designer. Whether the Designer has an explanation can simply be left an open question for future inquiry.
“Sometimes there are no second chances; so forgive the past, remember the present and prepare for the future. It’s the only life you’re given.”
The brush only has a comb on one side(Expander has combs on both sides) which can make applying mascara to your lower lashes quite difficult.
My disappointment at missing the Gorgie Boys cup triumph - sweet revenge against the team that knocked us out the cup last year - intensified some weeks later (stay with me on this one) when ITV televised Birmingham City’s FA Cup replay with Chelsea - in direct competition to UEFA Champions League games also being televised that Tuesday evening. UEFA stated the English FA hadn’t informed them the cup replay would be on television that night - although it hardly took a genius to work out that a tie involving one of the biggest clubs in England would be on television - but said they would be investigating the matter.
I’m in the home stretch of the Spring semester now. Needless to say I’ve been going a little crazy. Between two internships and a new job I’m all kinds of exhausted. Not to mention final papers and projects galore.
Apparently this film, Manic Monday, is all geared up to be the next Little Movie That Could, following in the footsteps of Blair Witch Project and Paranormal Activity. There were a number of simultaneous 'Secret Screenings' in various states, and as this is a horror movie by horror fans for horror fans, among the invitees were genre bloggers from the twisted bowels of the interwebs.
Committee Responsibilities:
1) You must be a follower of my blog.
So, the boys were fishing and Jack was doing his thing in the sand and mom got some alone time to stare and ponder how the hell I was going to successfully get home. I even managed to snap a few shots of the lake during this beautiful spring weekend though…
Style: Doppelbock
If the straying spouse happens to pick up a sexually transmitted disease, and later infects his or her spouse with that illness, that can give rise to a personal injury action between spouses called an interspousal tort.
I haven't done a long ride since getting sick on St Pukey's Day, and so, in a desperate attempt to htfu (ttfu? I can never remember...) I made the rather rash decision to do all today's commuting by bicycle. Two commutes, 10k each way. 40k total, first into sideways snow, then into a biting headwind with wet from the snow clothes, then into a directionally changed biting headwind, and finally into razor like rain. With another biting headwind. Fucker changed direction again. The snow hurt my eyes, the wind shrank my willy, the rain made me most miserable and cold. I don't fell any harder or tougher but I think I may have given myself new moan ee! ah!.
Less than 50 years since the passing of the Voting Rights Act, some have forgotten the importance of MLK Day beyond his “I Have a Dream” speech. He was a man of love, a man of peace. Somehow, it is not politically correct to talk opening about the experiences that shaped us. We’ve stopped having the conversations and open dialogue that serve not to separate us, but rather to continue the bridging of generations and the communities seeking answers and strategies to bring us closer to Dr. King’s dream. The O’Jays said it best, “Get on the Love Train…”. Take some time to dialogue with someone unlike you, learn something new and different. Seek understanding, and in doing so – Everyone love someone.
- Be consistent. I made a commitment to post every week. Is this hard? Heck, yeah it is. Some weeks I wonder where the idea for a post will come from, but then, the day before it’s due, I slip at the bowling alley and slide down the lane. As I’m crawling back to my chair in humiliation, my WriteBrain says “Finally, a blog post for this week.”
I was nervously keeping Geekygirl in sight as I bobbed and sang. She seemed engaged and happy and I noticed her lovely inner smile of pride glancing across her face. Still, I was shocked when I turned toward a splash and saw my little girl "diving" from a kneeling position into the pool! Surfacing in the arms of the teacher, laughing, and going right back to do it again. And again!
I’m on the internet a lot and read a considerable amount of useless information in articles that I forget about ten minutes later, but one thing I noticed today was how completely irrelevant stock photos are.
And it is another year after I last updated that and I still feel the same. Not much has changed between us, and that is kind of discouraging, but I still feel the same and I won’t fight it, deny it, or ignore it. All I can do at this point is try to control it. It’s hard, because feeling the way I do for you I just want to show you all the time, and that is the one thing I can’t do. You will run, as you have in the past. You will get spooked and crawl deeper into that shell. What do I do? I guess I just live my life, carry these feelings, and wait and see.
From its founding in 1912 Paramount had grown into what was at one point the biggest movie studio in the world. It owned a thriving theatre chain and released some of the most successful movies ever made. The studio became identified with comedies and released some of the best films in the genre. It was home to some of the greatest directors in the history of film. Through Fleischer Studios it produced some of the greatest animated films ever made. Paramount would also become the first studio to become involved in the medium of television. It would also increase its involvement in the new medium even as its own fate hung in the balance in the Fifties.
Chard by the Yard, so poetic… WTF is chard? I have often heard reference to this apparent vegetable, but despite being a chef, I have never known what chard is. My interest piqued, I donned my thinking cap and off I went on my tangent once again. Tangents are so much more fun than bicycles, much more adventurous. You have to keep on your toes when going off on a tangent because they don’t have a seat like a bicycle.
These relations between practical commitments are what underlie the instrumental dimension of practical reasoning (i.e., means-ends reasoning). They determine what would count as a satisfying a given practical commitment, and thus both what one must do (e.g., go to Nepal) and must not do (e.g., stay in the UK) if it is to be satisfied. However, there is more to practical reasoning than instrumental reasoning. There is reasoning about what one is going to do, as well as reasoning about how one is going to do it. We might call this the motivational dimension of practical reasoning, and it is underpinned by inferential relations that connect theoretical commitments to practical commitments, rather than those that connect theoretical to theoretical (and thus, indirectly, practical to practical). The kinds of inferences these correspond to are usually understood as inferences to intentions (i.e., practical commitments) from beliefs (i.e., theoretical commitments) when combined with desires (or other so-called pro-attitudes). What is distinctive of Brandom’s approach to practical reasoning (and the feature which is relevant to our concern with the notion of value) is the way he accounts for the role that desires (and other pro-attitudes) play in these inferences. To explain this I’m going to have to use some of Brandom’s own examples of such inferences:-
And the holly's, that never will pass,
“After a certain age, pigeons in Central London have no toes,” I said. “They just have little stumpy legs like Long John Silver.”
then Thursday flying from London to LA!
Completion of the first phase of construction at the Ridgewood Reservoir is being pushed back to next summer based on safety hazards uncovered by the city’s Parks Department in recent months.
:: I wonder sometimes how I managed to blog as often as I used to. Where did I find the time? I guess my priorities have a changed a little, but I still intend to get back here more often. I'm just out of the habit!
So what is in the purple shiny bag of shininess? Ta-da!!!
We indie sorts need to ask ourselves when is the last time we picked up the New York Book Review or the London Review of Books and read a negative review because the reviewer thought the cover 'garish', or the trim size didn't quite suit this genre, or the 60grm paper didn't come from regenerated forest stock. The fact is that the mainstream review press don't give a shit if the paper came from the most precious oak of the Brazilian rain forest, or if the 80grm paper it easier on the fingertips than 60grm.
I swear to you, I am incapable of lying, and so, in the spirit of honesty I must confess, as I
That is seen in what happened to 45 Zimbabweans. Just for watching and discussing a video on the Arab Spring in Feb. 2011, they were thrown in jail, tortured, and accused of treason, which allows a death sentence. International solidarity made the state drop charges on all but six, who were given suspended sentences. On the day of sentencing, hundreds of supporters of the defendants packed the courtroom or protested outside.
Many companies fall for the big numbers being touted about the size of the Indian middle class, the fact that it is the second most populous nation on earth and the second largest economic growth rate for most of the last decade. These figures can and have dazzled even the most seasoned marketers, and here begins the fallacy of easy growth and big revenues. For years the middle class number being thrown around was 300 million, by both the UN and the US President. In 2001 it was finally accepted as being total tosh after a comprehensive McKinsey Global Institute Study. But it did not matter because the allure was enough for many brands to pour money into India without ever questioning the numbers, and far more importantly without trying to understand the local market dynamics and unique consumer behaviour.
Well, the other night I realized something as I was driving into town after work to visit with him and thinking about all the things that I should be home doing, laundry, studying, defrosting the fridge, sleeping, making my bead soup, ....basically; bettering myself so that I can get out of this god-forsaken wasteland that I work in and open my business. That's when it hit me (out of the blue, like a bucket of water from the sky lol) that I spend A LOT of time on this "relationship" that isn't going anywhere. When I spoke with a friend about it today she seemed as shocked about me realizing it as I did. ...now, what to do... lol ...must be time to move on.
Good morning, and welcome to the Bring Back Beautiful challenge for april!
And sometimes I'd hang my head and cry
1 bears
Though Balhae was able to achieve rapid growth and prosperity a few decades after its founding due to the influx of immigrants, it sowed the seeds for its eventual demise.
Following the opticians we went to the library to renew Joshua’s books, Louis chose a peppa pig dvd to borrow and Joshua, surprisingly chose a book about autism and asperger’s syndrome. By this time Joshua was becoming more agitated about the possibility of my purse being stolen and extra protective of Louis in case ‘he wanted to steal Louis too’ so we got our taxi home.
Do you have a child that is ending their basketball season? Planning an end of the year celebration? Whether you’re celebrating a winning season, or getting over the sting of a losing season, About to bounce has the solution for your end of season celebration. You can even rent a sports themed spacewalk at www.abouttobounce.com and get your party started right.
Jenny Hope is a hugely talented poet. Not only is her poetry elegant, lyrical and precise, but she also revels in a dry wit, and a knowing glance. From Petrolhead her 2010 collection, she read from The Man who Married His Car, with the memorable opening : “ He was underneath her most weekends.” Jenny matches ear-catching phrases with a beguiling delivery, Woman included the line: “I seek out the roots of sleeping trees” – and we were hooked.
Rodriguez was rated as the fourth-best prospect in the state of Florida out of high school and grew into the starting role as point guard for K-State towards the end of the season. He was heavily recruited by Martin, who often looked to Miami as a place to get players in his time with the Wildcats. Martin, of course, coached high school basketball in Miami before he joined Bob Huggins’ staff in Manhattan in 2006.
I noticed the road sign at the entrance: “Sheikh Gilani Lane,” just as described in the South Asia Terrorism Portal article.
With over 800 exhibitors, there is plenty to see and a single day is probably not sufficient to visit even the majority of them, especially if you take the time to talk to the people behind the tables. But that size permits a huge diversity of products, appealing to different preferences, desires and needs. If you are not seeking ice machines for a restaurant or company, just ignore that booth and seek out what does call to you, maybe some oysters or shrimp. But also seek out something new to you, as everyone needs to expand their palates and you might find a new favorite. Be prepared to do lots of walking and standing, though you will find some places to sit for a rest.
Location: skype
Some who get paid to advise the rich on how to deal with the media and the public are telling clients to pay attention.
﻿I made this using an extra large bottle cap from Archiver's,
His calling as a writer was cemented in the years of 1957 and 1968 when a novel he had written won the consolation prize in a writing competition organised by Dewan Bahasa dan Pustaka.
All Yelling and Cross and Communicative.
Copies of Spy in the Vodka aren't exactly abundant; there's a few on AbeBooks, mostly going for rather a lot of money, and mostly with dustjackets that are in various states of disrepair – as is the one adorning my copy. Seems this particular jacket is rather delicate (see also those two Le Carre books I picked up). I mentioned in this really annoying post that I'd be returning to one of the two series that Thomas wrote during his career, and as well as being his first book, Spy in the Vodka/The Cold War Swap is also the first book in that series. Much more importantly, however (ahem), it's also the first book by Thomas that I've read – and I like what I see.
My BFF and mom say that I need to be open and go out with him again. I don’t know. Am I turned off because he’s an attractive guy, who appears to like me, and thinks I’m beautiful? Isn’t that what I want? Or is it that all I sense is the gay vibe when I’m in his presence? Considering I took 4 hours to text him back, and I’ve yet to hear from him again, this might not be a decision I have to make. I may have blown it already.
I sold my house and used the equity to purchase the equipment for my new studio. Then I bought a house where I could actually have my studio as well as my home. It was up and running before my six months disability leave was over. Also, several of my major clients at the cable company – people I had made commercials and programs for for years – were not pleased at all by the actions of the company towards me. They were glad to follow me and help establish my new business. Five years later, some of them are still crucial to my success.
* Take a moment to comment on the blogs telling them you're from Friday Follow
Let go of whatever makes you stop!
~A short paragraph telling us about yourself and your crafting history, including why you want to be on the Inky Impressions Design Team!
FORDA had been conducting significant research activity for some time. However, research into the social aspects had been less adequately addressed yet there were many problems in the social arena that affected agroforestry development.
Cooney raised four other issues involving possible abuses of power. The arrest of Moez Elmostafa certainly looks like witness tampering—especially since the five principal figures involved each gave different, and in some cases mutually contradictory, explanations for the decision. The alleged Linwood Wilson internal affairs inquiry into Sgt. Shelton appears like little more than an abuse of government power to punish a whistleblower. The NTO affidavit claimed that evidence existed that the players called each other by their numbers at the party—but no such evidence was in the possession of the police. And the entire affair raises the possibility of a cover-up.
party-goers, buskers, freaks & need
all of the elephants lie down,
My plan was to take a few weeks to learn Wordpress and make a smooth transition. Obviously, that didn't happen, so moving over was most definitely a trial by fire. If you noticed weird things happening this weekend, or if my blog was down for you, that's why. I hope that the majority of the links coming in and going out have been handled, but there are going to be some breaks, I just know it. If you come across anything, could you let me know? I'd really appreciate it!
Last night, as I slept,
here are a few inviting front porches from around the web...
Well that’s it for today. The first post in a while.
IPCONFIG is a great utility to resolve network connectivity issues where the internal network controller is at fault. Take this scenario for instance: if you were to type in ipconfig into your command prompt and were to see an IP of 169.254.?.?; then, there is definitely a problem where your integrated controller is not receiving an internet address from the DHCP server. Your DHCP (Dynamic Host Configuration Protocol) is the service that applies an automatic IP address to your computer so it can access the internet without having to configure an address yourself.
Yes, I understand that this show is a thriller and as such needs to be suspenseful, but every single episode has the exact same formula. Michael and Lincoln always seem to just do something that is one large step closer to them getting out of harms way and then right before the episode ends there is always the notorious bad guy that comes in to ruin the day. I also understand that this is used to create a cliff hanger and get the viewers to keep coming back week after week, but every single episode is predictable and now becoming boring.
PHILADELPHIA PHILLIES
SNPKs stock price, meanwhile, has jumped from its opening day closing price of 43 cents US to Wednesday’s close of $1.54 US. With 420.5 million shares outstanding (fully diluted), Sunpeaks Ventures’ total stock market value is now more than $600 million US.
whole and figure out what was claimed? Don t you begin with the specificat ion? What
Here’s a popular verse about my part of town:
Jonna is also known as Milo and very low in gluten. This is an other interesting recipe using sorghum flour. Is a very healthy and tasty dish for breakfast. Try this out if you are tired of making upma with rawa, semiya, puha or anything else for a change and definitely you will love it and will start making it again and again.
Unfortunately political leaders must have extreme power and control desires to achieve their status and tend to bend their statements to suit their agendas and reach voters accordingly and not by stating the truth.
To be honest I don't really get this hatred towards photographers. Sigur Rós has always been intensively involved in design, and your cd's do not look the same as the others available in stores. What is so bad about a photo shoot on occasion?
was solved, a new one arose.
Written by: Stephen Moffat, Edgar Wright and Joe Cornish, based on the comic books by Herge
Instead of acknowledging that radical Islam is the problem, we elected a president who blames America, whose idea of freedom is the right for women to suffer in silence behind a veil -- and who counts among his mentors and friends those who damn our country or believe that our own government staged the tragedy of September 11, 2001.
Jim asked: With all of the reports of ‘honor killings’ in the US and abroad – is there actually any Qur’anic basis for this practice?
Psychometry
Bowker and Stuart examined the ways in which ab initio students are eventually integrated into mainstream classes (i.e. post A-level and post Higher) in Scottish universities. They found that universities operated flexible entry requirements alongside a variety of teaching arrangements to support ab initio students. They concluded that ab initio provision is largely viewed as successful and is seen as a means of widening access and supporting the viability of language courses.
Though we make more each day,
5) Buzzcocks -- Singles Going Steady: YES
Engineer in Hell
Why Now? The Desperate Anglo Assault on Russia
Rule #5: As I look at the start of a new year (2012) there is a very real possibility that I will also be looking for a job this year. Academics being what it is I may not be “retained” in my current position. I am also looking at moving in with my parents mid-year to assist with caring for their needs. Am I concerned or afraid that I will not be able to find adequate work? Even with the economy the way it is and the employment issues in the area, I am confident that I will be able to find employment (or create it). I am not above work that would be considered “lower” than what I have been trained to do and I am not opposed to earning less than what I have been earning. So many people focus on “climbing the ladder” that when tough times hit they are too proud to take the position that will pay their bills. I am not.
...But perhaps better than Grouchoface.
The Liebster Award (German for favorite) is for bloggers with 200 followers or less. As a recipient of the award, you have the chance to thank and link back to the blogger who gave it to you as well as pass it along to five other deserving blogs.
Wavy "locks". A few days after undoing corkscrews, they look like this. Late last year.
I like the look of clustered words echoing the horizontal stripes on the eiffel tower.
Against what?
One wonders also now, what the stalinist European Union will do. When the Freedom Party helped form a coalition government in 2000, the New World Order went bananas, spat their dummies out and ignorning the will of the Austrian electorate carried out sanctions against Austria.
He leaned in and closed his eyes and I closed mine. I could feel his lips so close to mine, about to touch.
One of the most serious findings of both the Bernard Enquiry (Piarco Airport Project) and the Uff Report (UDeCOTT and HDC) was the extent to which the largest State projects were being executed outside of any normal system of accountability. The very purpose of setting up these companies and procurement methods was to bypass the Central Tenders Board. The natural consequence of that way of proceeding being that if the CTB could be sidelined as a deliberate act of public policy, then other important elements of the regulatory framework are violated as a matter of course. In the case of both UDeCOTT and NHA/HDC, accounts were not filed for years – since 2006 for the former and 2002 for the latter – in flagrant violation of the rules and laws.
Red Ice Radio interviews Sterling Allan, who says that free energy devices are almost here and available for sale to the public. So yes, you have to buy the device, but thereafter the electricity is free.
I agree with her assessment, but I’d like to add a few things into that:
Unfortunately for one of the bike murals, I have only a 2006 photo link to a mural by Steven Lowe, of a cyclist with the Vancouver skyline must before it was defaced. Luis Curan had the foresight to photograph Lowe’s original mural and post it along with other the Granville Bridge St. murals.
The chapter closes with a line, “Deciding what you’re going to write is a major step on the road to discovering yourself as a writer.” And Starts the next chapter on the assumption that you already know what it is you’re going to write. But to my great horror, I realized I have no idea. I feel like I can’t continue reading this book until I find it. And worse–I feel like I’ll never find it. A great weight has planted itself on my shoulders like a fat, mean Himalayan cat. It’s heavy and hot and rather itchy on the skin.
My experiences with the University have been really good. When I was planning to do my Graduation in US, I was looking for a State University with good faculty, good course curriculum, affordable cost and minimum duration to complete my Graduation. North West is one of the very few Universities which meets all of my requirements and was the obvious choice for me. After coming to the University, the program meets all of my expectations. Especially noteworthy about the program is the amount of importance given to lab sessions. There are continuous labs sessions, in tandem with help sessions that make you learn, the basic intricacies of programming.
Don’t be surprised for a Calgary business lunch, there could be a choice of a bison entree. At our workplace, there was bison chili as one of the chili choices for a United Way fundraiser. Then several weeks later, I chose bison at work Christmas annual restaurant lunch at guess what –a steakhouse. Bison ubiquity in Calgary is like fresh salmon or sushi in Vancouver: it’s not gourmet any more. It’s just part of the local fare.
http://www.maoritelevision.com/default.aspx?tabid=75&pid=12178- 'The Fit Club' is a really good half hour programme on Maori TV on Thursday nights all about health, fitness and nutrition.
Here we start to see what the magic that Bidmead sought to eliminate was. It was specifically the use of magic as an excuse to not explain things - the sort of silly play whereby the Doctor survives things or accomplishes things simply because he is the Doctor. It is an assertion that the Doctor’s mercurial powers must function materially now - that he must not simply destabilize the world but work his way through it, using language and observation and play within the system to dismantle it. The Doctor’s magic must be advanced magic, indistinguishable from technology, based on the play within a system and rules and the ambiguities and gaps of that system.
Hope that you are getting back into the swing of a new school year - whether IUP's or the local elementary/high schools. For those who don't have to worry about such things anymore - hope you're enjoying some great early Fall weather and the Indiana Co Fair.
Sent: Wednesday, March 21, 2012 12:54 PM
All I know is that I was super excited when I went to Sally's and saw this!
What I said yesterday was:
Love, The Makeuptress
Now I’m breathing like I’m running cause you’re taking me there
built by aching legs and tired souls
I love the balance in the design of the quilt.
Accessories: grosgrain ribbon, jumbo brad, glitter
but on a manicured expanse of lawn
Arthur has been developing innovative and effective child, youth and student engagement projects since 1991. His work helps local authorities support students become local champions for travel behaviour change. His secondary school program (created while working for BEST), Off Ramp, received an OECD award for Sustainable Transport: Education and Youth in 2000.In addition to this workshop, Arthur will be presenting at Velo-city Global 2012 Vancouver: Authentic Youth Engagement – Taking the Time to Enable Youth Leader Change Agents.
A shout-out to DD and CA for making me aware of these!
Alfred the Great first made mention to St George and his feast. By 1190 English ships adorned the white flag with the red cross. Many English kings used the flag on their armour and shields so as to be identified in battle.The crusades also spread the fame of St George across Europe.
There are times in our lives when the storm moves through quickly, other times when it seems to settle around us and rain for months. Sometimes, we continue moving ahead, slowing a bit perhaps, but still focused forward. There are other times when we need to wait upon the Lord, praying that he will give us greater vision and wait for him to clear the way. It is seldom in life that we gain greater advantage by pushing blindly ahead, not compelled by faith and wisdom, but driven by the stubbornness of our own determination.
In the end, Matthew missed out on the party completely - he had a fever that morning, so he had to stay home from school that day. Poor kid, he was so upset! He kept saying, "But they're going to have a pinata!". So I saved some jello just for him, and then I brought the rest to school. Hope everyone at the party enjoyed it!
Still, as Roven points out, "Although Max has studied the agents' manual and passed all the tests, he's never been in a situation where people are actually, well, shooting at him."
I'm a supporter of the truth and not the circus show that this has turned into. The media should be ashamed!
However, it was Luke who hurt himself. We hadn't been there 5 minutes and he had fallen down. He was wearing sandals so he got a cut on both feet where the sandals bit into his feet and each knee got skinned. Ouch! We slathered the owies with neosporin then he ran off. Next thing I know he'd buried his feet in the sand to "kill the germs". All this did was cause the sand to stick to the lotion around his wounds. great.
The Mod whippet looked further down the beach, he could see his master Greenfingers who was sat on a bench, smoking a cigarette and drinking a beer.
Now, here’s an even deeper revelation: based on his extensive knowledge of primate behavior, Maestripieri claims to be able to tell from a person’s emails whether or not they will succeed in life.
But I have chosen to write about it in hopes that it may help some of you and bring you to an awareness of a condition some of you may be experiencing now, or in the future.
Profession: Co-Founder, Hope For the Silent Voices
on a handmade sterling silver and crystal chain
Harmonize (You pay 1 less to play allies with printed cost 4 or more.)
So okay. LOOK, idiots. Read this REALLY CAREFULLY, sound out the words if you have to, because you’re about to fucking LEARN something, maybe, if you’re not already too braindead to salvage. Are you paying attention, you fucking fuckwits? Okay. So: YOU DON’T HAVE TO BE IN COMMON CLASS TO SPELL YOUR FUCKING WORDS RIGHT. You know why? Because people who aren’t fucking stupid DO NOT sit around and go “Well I know how to spell this word, but it’s just the internet, so it’s really not worth the extra trouble, so I’ll just save the effort and spell it this other way that’s wrong but what the hell it’s just the internet ffs” – yeah, people DON’T do that, because you know why? Because if you know how to fucking SPELL, you just DO it and don’t even think about it, and then you go about your merry not-retarded day. And if you DON’T know how to spell, then people are going to figure you’re just stupid, because hey, guess what, YOU MOTHERFUCKING ARE.
The links that I have given provide more information about relaxation response and eliciting the relaxation response. These are from the institute that runs the program. In fact, my psychologist may have even come up with these herself.
Parables require effort. Parables require eyes of faith to see and ears of faith to hear. We have to listen and participate.
Yeah I'm back...After a five mile trek through the English "wilds" - So here I am, the endorphins are flowing, my feet are killing me but I did get a prize for all that hard slog....Geez, I love the flow of endorphins after a long walk...You should try it...
PUTAR: It seems that the Municipalities in Pakistan are exceptionally efficient.
That man looks at Junsu as he licks his corner of lips that has some blood. If Junsu is a ‘normal’ human, he definitely will run his life away from that man, but it’s Kim Junsu, a human who never appreciate life… anymore.
3.Refrigerate cake at least 8 hours (or up to overnight). To serve, cut into wedges with a serrated knife.
2) If you could meet anyone on this earth, who would it be?
Max didn't want to go to the game at all - he spent most of the game like this:
Part 1 has been described as;
In a large mixing bowl, zest lemon, then cut in half and add juice. (The original recipe said to use the juice of half a lemon, but I decided to use the whole lemon, and I’m glad I did). Add oregano, rosemary, garlic, salt, and olive oil to the lemon mixture.
I dreamt of our long conversations
This point of view, of course, is the ultimate refuge for people with more software than talent.
The Revolutionary War was fought because we were being taxed and we didn’t have representation by those who were taxing us, meaning the monarchy in England, King George. This seemed to me one of the real-life encounters with truthiness — a slogan that has no meaning, but there’s a great deal of passion behind it. I believe that lady probably believed she had no representation.
Pirates of the Caribbean: On Stranger Tides
Irises are pretty hardy flowers; they like intermittent deep watering and lots of sunshine. The ones by my patio are a super tall variety. When the winds come through, my beautiful row of irises can be toppled flat and stalks snapped in two. It crushes me when that happens, probably because I love them so much.
After each Aspen visit, the pair would ask the same questions: “Why doesn’t Atlanta have a festival?” and “Wouldn’t it be great to showcase the food and beverage traditions of our region – the entire Southern region?” But it wasn’t just the image of celebrating the best of Southern food and drink that got the two thinking; it was also the notion they could take the best elements of other national festivals, build upon them and then infuse a spirit of honoring the regional food traditions that got them excited.
MR. STEWART: Again, I don't -- I don't think it would be a bold step to say that machine-or-transformation is the test. That is, we have gone for --
What Osu meant, when uttered by a Samurai, was that whatever task had just been agreed to, it would be carried out under the strictest of penalties. When your boss summons you in and tells you the project must be completed by Friday, no matter what, answering Osu is like saying "I will die before this task is left uncompleted to your satisfaction."
Yeah, we all like getting treasure. Treasure is neat, it makes your character ‘better’ (a silly concept in an RPG, but I’ll touch on that later), but does it really make the game more fun? I personally don’t think so. Imaginary stuff isn’t ‘fun’, and I don’t think an intelligently designed pen-and-paper RPG should hinge upon the acquisition of imaginary stuff with few exceptions. That’s for video games, which need those things and can do them better, since it is adjudicated by a computer and not a person (the GM) and doesn’t have the benefit of being played while sitting in a room with your buddies. In short, video games are not a social endeavor (not even MMORPGs), and must rely on other things to provide entertainment value. You want your character to look cool, make cool noises when she/he swooshes a sword, and kill the larger baddies that hitherto have banished your character to the last save point (something lacking in pen/paper RPGs, and rightly so).
Do you have any prayer requests today?
In this case Larry (I think he was named Larry) was looking kind of pathetic, wearing himself out trying to run up the sink and getting nowhere. I felt bad for him. Surely he didn’t get this big by being stupid and this is how things would end? It didn’t seem right. And then he did the cutest thing: he stopped climbing and walked over to a water drop and starting drinking. Seriously. Like a fucking puppy. Adorable.
Nylen P, Ebendal T, Eriksdotter-Nilsson M, et al. Testicular atrophy and loss of nerve growth factor-immunoreactive germ cell line in rats exposed to n-hexane and a protective effect of simultaneous exposure to toluene or xylene. Arch Toxicol 1989; 63: 296-307.
If on a sunny day you hear that 70’s pick up line from over your shoulder remember this warning. Oh and his name is “Leaf Blower,” don’t be fooled he is not European.
Wow my 800th post was awesome!! Best blogger ever!!
or make note of any you could not comment on
to us a son is given,
Rumi
It still wasn't bad though. Naturally, my biggest accomplishment was my lace vest.
I am not saying that we play all of these well. Sometimes, we sound like a band composed of drunk street urchins, trying to bang out a tune to pay for the next meal. Sometimes, as in the case of my husband, the ivories are tickled just right and make music that charms. Mostly, however, the sounds we make are middling in quality, but ring true in the arena of total, unrestrained fun.
Considering all the stuff that's happening at the school, I thought my children deserved a mental health day- Luckily my friend, Michelle thought she (and her kids) needed a mental health day too. That's right. I let my children play hooky from school.
Earl Blackwell, famously, did a lot of entertaining in the ballroom and in an interview said that his guests ".... leave the elevator, come into the entrance hall and immediately see a bar. That represents security for many people. And, you know, people don't like to walk into an enormous room until others are already there. If you have a little bar area where they can immediately go for a drink, several groups will gather then drift into the large room.
2. Willow Weep for Me
We are very happy to answer any questions about the study and to help you determine if you are right for the study. Contact us using the information below:
Let it be known that EVERY single fact I have published about you in this posting and elsewhere on my various blogs is true and correct in every material detail.
Actor, A Team
“You can’t just walk away from our love. When I’m with you, I feel normal.”
After the race, I celebrated Cinco De Mayo by eating left-over taco salad. I love this taco salad so hard. Recipe here. Then I gave myself a much needed mani/pedi in Essie Tart Deco.
The Bronze Drake is a guarenteed drop as long as you get to the boss in time. You just have to win the roll. If you take a buddy or two with you it should be easy to get it.
Some background on Abdul-Malik’s jihad joint and the long list of Muslim terrorists who made it home, via CAIR and the 9/11 Mosque:
Here's Nicole Knickerbocker in an awesome animal print dress! I like how the shoes add a subtle edge to the outfit.
Trying to find something, anything.
Box Office: miltonboxoffice@hudd.ac.uk
Supposedly, yes. Barangay election is a non-partisan political exercise. But to find a Barangay in the whole country where there is absence of partisan exercises is very difficult.
I am aware of cases where we have got this spectacularly wrong, where a small clique has successfully controlled the decision making to create a decision they feel happy with, rather than the right decision. The root cause of two particular cases of this was one person being valued more highly than another. Equality is essential in a Quaker meeting: the only hierarchy is from respect, earned individually from each person, and a high baseline of respect given to everyone. And yet I know Quakerly decision making is possible, and I am committed to felicitating it.
the first time in my arm
The idea for the confluence of personal gadgets and beer marketing is obvious: steering beer drinkers to the brand.
As he shouts obscenities towards the screen and throws his controller across the room in frustration, I can’t help but think I’m better off with my books and my blogs that have a complete end to satisfy my need for closure.
And last but not least: Scott Dyer and a friend
What is the first thing that Aaron (the high priest) supposed to do to the goat? Why? (“He is to lay both his hands on the head of the live goat and confess over it all the wickedness and rebellion of the Israelites – all their sins – and put them on the goat’s head.” (Leviticus 16:20b-21 NIV) We have seen the practice of imposing hands on the head as far back as Jacob when he blessed Joseph’s sons Ephraim and Manasseh. It was customary also in the early church to commission people by means of the laying on of hands. At one point in most ordinations (of ministers and priests and bishops) there is the laying on of hands as a sign of authority being conferred.)
hocofood@@@
All Jains in India have Hindu names. All Jains apart from worshipping (Lord) Mahavira also worship Hindu Gods especially Ganpati, Laxmi, Krishna & Durga. Many office bearers & activists of the Vishwa Hindu Parishad (VHP) are from the Jain community even the International General Secretary of VHP
